Markings on the lens barrel on 35mm SLRs are the depth of field lines (on the lens mounting ring), color coded to the aperture values (on the aperture ring), and the distance scales in meter and feet (on the focusing ring). Mastering these markings will set you free to used your camera to compose your photographs from anywhere in the macro world to the world of high speed activities with out a second thought of focus.
I have said it many times our leaders were feeding at the trough with the bankers and the developers, nothing will be done about this disaster because the corruption started at the very top.
Me: Ok, but… can you tell me about it now because we haven’t talked in a long time..
The Contemporary A Cappella Society website just published my review of SingStrong 2012:
Leafy lettuces are a great source of folate, vitamin A and vitamin C.
“The decedent possibly
And if the vehicle is not as healthy as it should be, aren’t you the “Doctor”??…… And aren’t you going to diagnose and prescribe a process to get the vehicle better??
So what is going to be required to make this happen? First up, there’s going to have to be a number of employers who are prepared to offer 15 hours work a week, during school hours. There’s no point in requiring sole parents to work 15 hours a week if no such jobs are available, so I’m assuming that National will be putting some sort of incentives in place to encourage the creation of such jobs.
Offal. Hmm…a little foray into denotation and connotation is in order. According to the Meriam-Webster dictionary, offal is “the waste or by-product of a process, esp. the viscera and trimmings of a butchered animal removed in dressing.” That would sound an “awful” like what goes into scrapple or hotdogs. According to our in-house haggis researcher John, the MacSween company would probably narrow that down to organ meats such as heart, liver, and lungs. Americans throw that stuff away, but the rest of the world does eat it. Anything that sounds that awful and is pronounced as such gets a bit of a negative connotation on this side of the Pond.
It was quite a cold day today with dark clouds hovering over our pastureland and the wind coming off the snowy mountains was biting and mind numbing so instead of working in the garden, starting to prepare to plant seeds and starts, I spent the day cooking and cleaning and running errands. I did manage to make a trip out to the garden to add a bowl of compost from today's kitchen trimmings to the compost bin our neighbor and friend, Jeff, helped Kurt to construct for me on the edge of my garden. Bundled up as if it were December, I quickly dumped the contents of the stainless steel bowl, (onion skins and carrot ends and cucumber peeling, etc.,) and then I ran back to my kitchen where it was warm and cozy. Today, as most days here do, I was reminded that I don't live in just anyplace on the planet, I live in Montana and here one never knows what to expect. One day you can be doing nothing much at all and enjoying a mild Spring day and in just a moment you are dashing across your pasture trying to dodge a rain-burst from a system making its way from the North and that system could be dumping rain, snow, sleet or snow. Even in July. Inasmuch as I'm waiting with great anticipation to break out my nice navy blue Capri pants and white top to wear with blue sandals, or my lovely dress hanging in my closet now for quite some time without ever coming out, chances are I'll be wearing long pants with thermal underwear and my Carhart jacket for much of the rest of this year, minus a few weeks once we do actually see some warmer temperatures.
If you are headed to India and you are still wondering which tour packages to choose, then better start with the Ladakh zanskar Tour. Zanskar is a place located 20 kilometers the south of Rangdum, Ladakh and the best time to visit the place is between June to September. Any Ladakh Tour would offer great sightseeing tours and is well loved by the passionate trekkers. In fact, through time, it has been a known tourist spot which led to the establishment of various hotels and camping areas to offer accommodation.
They plan to start offering growlers in the future! Yay!
And what does God have to do with marriage anyway? The traditional people have taken it away from him. Marriage is no longer a religious union. God doesn't issue wedding licenses and give tax breaks to married couples. God doesn't grant lawyers and judges the power to dissolve those who have been joined by the rules and regulations of their governing state.
Notable Books for Younger Readers:
Kicked in
He drew back and let that cane rip. It was only one blow, but it hit higher than he has possibly ever hit me before, at the very top of my bottom. It was high, and it hurt. The skin there is somehow so much more sensitive to cane strokes, I guess.
The nicest thing about Mudaridge was that it was such a peaceful, relaxing place. After just a few days members of the family began to treat each other more lovingly.We spent five nights at Mudaridge, and some of it was not exactly peaceful. Next post details a family get-together, and our 4WD adventure through the Barrington Tops.
Posts like this are difficult to write, because of course I want to go on and on about why black women are awesome (we really are)… but I won’t. Instead, I will explain a few differences between me and my best friend that may or may not have anything to do with the color of our skin.
Because the Chicken Highway was washed out, we had to backtrack down through Whitehorse, turn southwest toward Bear Creek, Yukon Territory and then finally head northward again to Tok.
Mix all the ingredients under meat in a pot and place the pot on a medium heat. Heat the meat as you mix and break the ground meat with cooking chop sticks or a fork if you don’t have any chop sticks. (If you use a fork, be careful as you might leave marks on the bottom of the pot.) When the meat is completely cooked, lower the heat and leave it for about 10 minutes. The meat will look like the one on the right photo.
Matt C.
Anne Platt and I have been talking recently about the 'feeling' of being cushioned in Gods Love and held up by the Prayers of others. So Thank you God, thank you for that peace that passes all understanding as the Holy Spirit soaks us in HIS balm.
My main argument for why Kobe will never be Jordan is that Jordan never lost in the Finals. Kobe has lost twice in the Finals. The 04 Pistons and the 08 Celtics beat the Kobe led Lakers. In essence Kobe has had more opportunities than Jordan to win more rings. And had Jordan not taken two years off to play baseball I’m almost positive that Jordan would have led the Bulls to two more Championships. It’s hard to argue otherwise. Most great players in that era didn’t get to win a ring because of Jordan. Those two years off had NBA greats salivating at the opportunity. Hakeem Olajuwon and the Hawks were the one’s who capitalized on that short window. Jordan doesn’t lose when it matters most. Jordan won a NBA title with the flu. Kobe is always hurt, but I’m almost convinced it’s for effect because he still will come out and drop 37 without a grimace on his face unless he misses.
“Dennis Kucinich has to decide what his legacy is going to be. Will he be remembered as a principled member of Congress or the narcissist who lost two Congressional races in two states the same year?” Pelz said on Sunday
It cannot kill friendship.
Note well: the marinade can be made ahead, but don't add the shrimp until about 45 minutes before you cook them. The citrus in the marinade will start to cook the shrimp and will make them rubbery if left too long.
It starts with an email from the CNN booking team- normally I get them in the early morning. Sometimes they pitch me topics, other times the show isn’t set yet and they just need to know If I’m available.
I used to avoid flexion when I injured my back a few years ago and then came to the realization that avoiding flexion is why I hurt my back in the first place as I didn’t have a whole lot of lumbar flexion to begin with. What many doctors won’t tell you if you hurt your back is whether you have flexion intolerance or extension tolerance. There is a difference and each pathology has a different rehab protocol.
Step two: Underwear. If your underwear sticks out when you bend over… throw them away right now! No one wants to see your unmentionables… especially if they are ugly. Realize this. YOU ARE BETTER THAN GRANNY PANTIES. Go to Victoria Secret and you can get the 5 for 25 deal. Or the 3 for 30 deal. Having three pairs of cute underwear is better than none. I’m not saying you have to buy thongs or sexy underwear. Buy something that will make you smile when you put them on. Just because you are 20, 30, 40, 50, 60, or 70; doesn’t mean you get to give up on your self.
You are the womb of life, Snow;
Double Up is a street-wear clothing boutique located at 611 E Grand River in East Lansing, Mich. Double Up primarily sells sneakers, hats and tee shirts to men and women between the ages of 18 and 24.
Illustration Size: approximately 8" x 10"
Rating: 2 1/2 stars!
First, the live NASCAR experience starts with tailgate parties that make even the most seasoned, southern college football tailgaters look like amateurs. Campers show up as much as a week in advance, fly their driver flags and start the party. There’s also an entire festival area that surrounds the tracks, with games, driver signings and souvenir trailers for every team. If you DO get to a race, make sure you hit the Skoal tent whether you dip or not. It’s worth your time.
anxiety causes me to do irrational things. there is nothing obscene or illegal about this blog. if the cops knocked on my door about that person’s search leading to the blog, it would be regrettable, but it wouldn’t take long for them to realize what happened.
Constitutional amendment to provide that marriage between a man and a woman is the only domestic legal union that shall be valid or recognized in this State."
After leaving the arboretum, I swung into an antique shop. I even left my purse in the truck, tucking it behind the bench seat. I told myself, "Today is a "look, don't buy" kind of day."
We moved on to Italy for our next round of the Wine Walk.
The Ball pens
A New Blog!
Thank you, Teresa!
“Kid, what are you doing?”
All in all, do I think that the Kinect games themselves will provide much more than engagement and incentive for my students? Not really. However do I think that the Kinect sensor technology offers some interesting Redefinition opportunities for the classroom? Why yes, I do. Let the experimentation begin.
You knew everyone in your street - and so did your parents.
I got to see chef Michael Simon’s demo of pot roast but left to make it Food Parc before it ended. It was another awesome event you wish happened more than once a year because that is food passion personified.
To support the self-described ’Bunch of Crazy Farmers’ (personified by Andy, in orange below) who now own the tug, the Alwyn website says they “selling space for banners of about 1 metre square, at R5 000 ($US 639.30). The advertisements are mostly in connection with agricultural products and services, partly because everybody knows who are responsible for saving this historic vessel! Partly also, it’s because those are the firms we know, support and can ask!”
And if I may be allowed to bounce up and down a little because, not having had a book out for a few months and having made a pact with myself not to submit any books for review in 2012 I don't very often get reviews outside of Amazon and Goodreads, I would love to point to a review I got for my set of poems performed at Blackwell's for International Women's Day, from Sabotage, which is the UK's leading spoken word review site. I was particularly chufflicated by:
Again, the gold mine of the tractor shack area recently yielded a couple of steel ladder-like structures that we are now using to bridge a couple of workstands to create plant start stands. The laying boxes for the property's long gone chickens are now hung on a wall in the tractor shack and used as cubbies.
In this last year and a half as I have moved deeper and deeper into a life of spirit, wanting to serve others to the best of my ability, I find myself falling in love with the world, and the tiniest living things on our planet captivate me. In the garden now there are ladybugs, the magical praying mantis, birds too many to count at my numerous feeders, and the mischievous squirrels who are bent on turning the feeders upside down in their attempt to eat everything they can before I shoo them off! And all the dear little plants. I buy tiny own root roses, small rooted cuttings from home gardeners on eBay, and I plant them in an area of the garden where the little ones grown on before they are large enough and sturdy enough to plant in the ground. It is truly a wonder to see them grow big and tall and put out buds and burst into flower. I have my camera back and ready to start taking garden pictures which I will share very soon. Some of the roses have grown big enough that I am transplanting them around the cottage, and the front porch is surrounded by ten hanging baskets, four huge pots with roses and clematis growing up the pillars to be trained, as I have already begun, to drape the porch with roses. There are herbs aplenty and the porch is redolent of the scents of lavender, rosemary, lemon sage, fragrant geraniums, huge pink gerbera daisies planting amidst the herbs and so much more. Bright yellow coreopsis, petunias in many colors and lilac colored colored verbena, impatiens in a rainbow of colors, oh, the world is so full of so many wonders this time of year.
The 2007 episode "Daleks in Manhattan" shows the creation of a Human Dalek through a genetic treatment and a mutagenic solution that allows a Dalek to absorb a human and merge with it.
I laughed even more, now my embarrassment was tinged with sadness.
I learn so much from my kids.
Isomil Plus (New formula)
This post is not going to give you a 'quick fix' nor is it meant to be a lecture to make anyone feel bad/guilty etc. There are a few tips but more importantly I have three inspirational stories to share with you, to help kick start you on a healthier path, one that I hope you continue on, well past January ;)
Because here's the sheer reality. We're heading for economic meltdown. What we need is an educated large middle class population with a huge buying power. Instead we're to have Extremist self-interested populists like Malema cause economic meltdown havoc. Because this country and well as most of Africa is too clueless to see the benefits of making sure every last criticise is given a fair chance to perform well to the benefit of the entire economy. I understand that Progressive Socialism is not understood in this "Bold and the Beautiful", "Young and the Restless" American media Capitalist educated population of ours.
The rules are: select four previously published pix you think would make great note cards, and link up. I can do that!
“It’s been a long year. And not a good one.” I looked at my friend. She nodded. “But I’ve had worse. And I’ve had an idea about a new story I want to tell…”
A picture is worth a thousand words, and these ones are saying loud and clear, I am a superbly organized closet!
Immigration is a weapon for the destruction of ethnically homogeneous nations. By transferring people across the globe, the unity of the land with the people who dwell on it is broken. When a territorial area is shared by many peoples of differing origins and cultures, it ceases to be anything other than a political entity, as defined by the legal boundaries within which it rests. For a land to be a real living country, it must be culturally one, and ethnically distinct. Anything less is meaningless.
Best Overseas Bottled or Canned Beer
“Well, I can and I can't. I die but I'll always come back. When I die it's like I'm just asleep. If something that bad happens to me anyway. I stabbed myself in the heart for Geoff over there without any trouble, but my brain was pretty damaged in the crash, and my body was absolutely mangled. Even if you can't die, would you want to be awake for that pain?” Osbourne did think that was a good point. Even if you can't die, you can still feel pain. There are points where pain is incredibly intolerable.
Miranda: "To the women who do it without help! Assuming they didn't give themselves an injury eye rolling when you had a panic attack after your daughter smeared icing on your Valentino skirt."
I wrote some lines once on a time
In a large bowl, combine the cheezy mashed potatoes and the okra-corn sautee. In a separate bowl or cup, mix 2 Tbs. chickpea flour wth 2 Tbs. water to make a loose paste. This will act as a binder. Add the paste to the bowl and mix the contents well. I do it with my hands to make sure everything mixes thoroughly.
Beauty in relationships is a priceless gift!
Includes Gore Crane Fees Estimated Total $ 14,500.00 +New
Enough said there. Don’t judge, I thought this was acceptable. Although really strange and very gross, I still think it is funny. In case you were wondering, squirrel tastes like chicken.
Notes: Using this quote will make you want bacon. Then again, so will anything else so long as you’re a man. You’re a man, aren’t you?
Saturday night, home alone again we watched Pirates of the Caribbean, #4, Johnny Depp is delightfully naughty but the film didn't hold my attention although the ferocious mermaids were interesting. I was left wondering why a talent such as Mr Depp makes these films...but perhaps in the small print of his contract for the first Pirates he has too.
Me? back to our main site to investigate a long term leak. The roofers and the steeplejacks have messed around up there many a time, they were ordered to scrape off all the old repairs, get right to the root of the problem and fix it.
Shabby Chic does not come naturally to me, but I am blessed to be surrounded by extremely talented ladies on the JR Design Team and I jokingly say that I am channeling my inner Mona for this card!! LOL!! Mona, my friend, thanks for the inspiration!! :)
For the people vital instances that any of us might need an inexplicable sum of money, and we want to buy from the soonest time possible, the payday advances could be the respond to that just may spend less us from going down helplessly powering. All of us feel the crisis inside our lives in particular the sudden harshness and challenges regarding money. This may be by means of an auto repair, deadline day of installments, or perhaps a unexpected car accident. These amongst others could be tense specially when could that the following payday advance is 1 / 2 monthly absent.
i'm doing the february photo a day challenge on instagram! are you?? i am commited! follow me! my user name is rach_loveyoumore. speaking of february....29 days this year. see? weird.
I guess I have spent so much time engulfed in this musical fantasy land that I have almost severed all my ties with reality. I cannot really say that I care because we all need an escape sometimes. Mine so happens to sing to me, how about you?
Kuwait’s Interior ministry faced down the protests with tear gas,
As the Campaign kicks off, you'll have the names and blog addresses of the Campaigners on my List of Campaigners page (above), so you can keep in touch with the other Campaigners. That way you’ll have a list of bloggers in the same position as you, who genuinely want to help you succeed. And you'll be able to meet those who have the most in common with you. You can visit their blogs and other places they haunt, follow along, leave comments galore, and share your highs and lows as you journey through the blogosphere and build your online platform. And they'll be doing the same for you.
Eventually, as we see in the film, the Cuban revolution was won. Che and Castro achieved their goal, for better or for worse. Cuba was no longer under the rule of Batista. After this, Che disappears from Cuba. This is where the second CHE film (called Guerrilla) begins. On this second film we see Che going to Bolivia to organize a similar revolution against a government that was also abusing its people, and that was also aided by U.S. military. Problem is that this revolution had a very different outcome, the film shows how the Bolivian people didn’t really support Che because the government had a hate and fear campaign on the media saying all sorts of lies about Che, in this way scaring the people from wanting to join his guerrilla. Still, this campaign of lies did not stop his movement. He took it as far as he could. Che going to Bolivia like that proved one thing, he went were ever the people were being abused and oppressed, no matter what country. This is why he considered himself a “citizen of the world”, he would go where ever he was needed, where ever people where being stepped on.
10 Lorelai
WW: It was honest at least! In the couple of years since I’ve been following your blog, you’ve written a highly acclaimed YA novel, a How to Write book, a guide to Twitter, Write a Great Synopsis book and republished your first YA novel. Wow, respect for all that! What’s coming next?
Good communication is a must; customer’s obviously don’t like to be left waiting just as we don’t. This is something that annoys me immensely so it really is something we keep on top of.
It is so obvious their intentions when they do something to one another that they are doing it to make the other one angry. They will sit and listen when one of them speaks, waiting for the opportunity to pounce or they will do something they know will make the other angry and walk away with a smirk on their face.
Dodd-Frank was sold to the House and Senate, as in the best interest of the public, just so they could be charged more money for services.
Article 54
My Minds Eye- Holiday Damask paper
My mom’s beginnings are vague – she was born to a single woman whom I only knew by the name of Minnie. Her birth mom visited our home only once that I recall when I was age 12. My oldest brother attempted to trace my mom’s genealogy after her death, but he could find no birth certificate or adoption papers in our state or county birth records.
Spite
*UPDATE*
I am having so much fun and so overwhelmed! There are literally buildings of stuff!!!!!! It is 70% off what you pay retail. Furniture, jewelry, clothes, etc. Here are some pics:
digressing
Emerson grunted as he reached across the table, pushing the fistful of remaining straws in Claypool’s direction. The engineer winced, then scowled at his captain. Beck could have sworn he saw tears welling up in the man’s eyes.
This Sunday I was given the privilege of preaching to our congregation on Matthew 7:7-12. For those of you who don’t know, I an associate pastor at a medium-sized church, which means I get somewhere between seven and ten opportunities to preach on a Sunday morning each year. By way of illustration this past Sunday, I expressed to the body that during the weeks when I preach I often feel a greater sense of dependence upon the Lord. Verses like James 3:1 – “… we who teach will be judged with a stricter judgment” and 1 Peter 4:11 – “… whoever speaks is do to do so as one who is speaking the utterances of God” create in me a healthy fear of missing the point of the text and leading people away from the truth. So, I find myself praying often during those weeks and thinking hard about the meaning of the text and how it applies.
First, you collect the blossoms! Dandelion stems are very bitter, so you cut off all the stem, leaving only the flower (plus green flower bit/thingy underneath it, so that the flower holds together!).
Because I joined the team later than the rest, the first person I met and befriended was Chanyeol. When I have to go to practice, I would ride the subway or sometimes I would walk, and sometimes Chanyeol would go with me.
Raven’s appeal, then, was not particularly in any of the horror work he had done so far so much as in the fact that his look, and voice, already seemed so ideally suited to the material.
Digital Stamper
Improved metadata capabilities (element level)
The case has provoked mixed reactions. Zimbabwean women’s rights groups have criticised the reaction as disproportionate, shifting attention away from female rape victims. Men are reported to be afraid, refusing to get into cars driven by women, “Even if she is old”, said one hitchhiker outside Harare. But this has not stopped the local press printing a cartoon showing a naked man trying to attract the attention of women drivers.
My family is just the best!
As he landed on the soft ground beneath his hospital room window, Xu Guan realized that his airborne training had just saved his life. Back in 2011, Xu Guan had volunteered for PLA airborne school and completed the training. At the time, it was nothing more than a way to escape the doldrums of his current assignment. The training, as it turned out, proved to be much more valuable when jumping from a hospital window than it had jumping from a plane. Xu Guan had never made a single combat jump.
My God has called me to go to India.
Well, New Labour took two million people out of the 40-60% range but added nearly a million to the under 40%s.
LYRIC: “Charles, don’t you ever crave to appear on the front of the Daily Mail dressed in your mother’s bridal veil?”
Having the correct and dependable outdoor tent can make for an enjoyable camping trip. It is important to have the proper tent to keep you dry, safe, and protected. Have a good plan in mind and pack well for all occasions. Be familiar with the tent you are bringing.
Well, that's it for now.
Prince noted that Judge Colin Lamont had earlier prohibited the singing of the song "Ayesaba amagwala" because it WAS hatespeech.
Note that the default captcha definition is case-insensitive but can be changed to case-sensitive. In this session I have left the captcha case-insensitive.
The benefits are not limited to the financial prowess of the management team. Owners of REITs aren’t going to receive phone calls at 3am to fix an overflowing toilet!
I used this on both myself and my husband. He too said he thought it was helping. Applying this after a bath or shower is best, when it can really penetrate your skin. You don't need to use a lot either; just a little will spread and melt into your skin. If you use too much it will just be too greasy and you'll waste it - so start off with just a little and add more if you need it.
It’s never really what you own but what you threw away
Stage Door (US…Gregory la Cava)
“Ah ha,” I thought, “I cannot get where I think I am supposed to be going without a vision.”
He insisted it’s wrong to be giving corporations tax breaks while people are going without food.
South Africa
The last time we went to the ward camp out Katie was cutting her first tooth and cried the whole night... We were lovingly told by a few friends that they were overjoyed to hear our family all night long...lol So I am a little worried!
You end up paying for that vacation for months … souring you on booking anything else for the foreseeable future.
you swivel, darling, there above the yew;
You are a social butterfly. You easily win the hearts of others with your addictive smile and your charming personality. You wave to strangers and in a soft high pitched whisper you say, “Hi.”
That is all well and geeky, but there are several weird spots. One, the lie detector says a Jaffa who was in an earlier altercation with the murdered Tok’ra is lying, but the killer turns out to be the Ashrak, not him. The problem is written off with Sam commenting the lie detector is not perfect. The result just means he is lying about something. Okay…what? Two, how did bra’tac survive? The Ashrak is a master assassin who is noted for using a knifing technique that kills both host and symbiote instantly. He did not use it on Bra’tac? It necessary for the sake of the story he did not, but it still stretches credulity. Three, Jonas is only given a cameo while he is stuck at SGC. Sure, he does not have much in the way of military skill, but leaving him out of the adventure just reinforces the idea he is not a true replacement for Daniel. I assume there is an upcoming episode in which Jonas is featured prominently, so his absence here is to give Corin Nemec a brather. Or maybe Jonas really is an afterthought at this point.
So we must ponder solemnly upon the message that Jesus is sending us with this victory -on His very Sacred and Hallowed Birthday- and be thankful for His benevolent and judicious generosity. For what better Christmas gift can Jesus give you but the gift of me? And a glorious reign under my iron fists of galvanized Anointed wisdom for the next 8760 hours?
I think this bracelet is actually a gauntlet, since A-Dubs knows I rarely wear pink. This is A-Dubs saying, "Branch out, woman!" I've actually worn it quite a lot, much to my surprise, but only sandwiched between silver ones. I'm phasing it in during this bracelet phase.
Louisianaians have been fusing cuisines since the 1760s.
I don’t call men. I never have. Yeah, I know…it’s so…50s. So…Ward and June Cleaver. So…me. I never initiate communication. I don’t want to misread a man’s signals and then push myself into his world. I would rather wait and see. Or in this case…wait, and wait, and wait.
In the dark mare of her mind he saw what seemed to be an Elf stalking his Majesty.
It could be that you blow bubbles in the memory of someone, world peace or maybe for an other personal reason
Almost six years on though, six years living the life of an expat Norwegian, I was seeing Scandinavian culture thriving in the media, spearheaded by Stieg Larsson. And so I decided to rethink my stance on Scandinavian literature. I proclaimed to the world that Scandinavia was the best place in the world, yet wasn’t living there. So the least I could do was know what was going on in my home country’s literary scene.
So, I decided to ask for one of these earth-dwellers to help me with the building of my house, which had been at a standstill for 2 years. I specifically stated my requirements (I thought) that were as follows —
You powers, who make mankind your care,
“The foot-and-mouth disease outbreak that originated in Ganghwa County of Incheon might have been spread by a farmer who recently visited China,” a report dated May 18, 2010 said.
"Apparently I was awake on the way to the helicopter and I got a bit fighty, I wanted to do a piece to camera, but my eyes were pointing in different directions," he said of his trip by air ambulance to Leeds General Infirmary.
2.) Now for the soaking. As I demonstrated yesterday, you just need some kind of big container in which you place you beans and fill it with cold water. The best thing is to do this before you go to bed, stick it in the fridge, then it gets to sit the next day and they should be really ready by the time you want to cook them. (If you are making black beans, why not soak some cashews too and make cashew sour cream?)
deacon, was their leader.
- Guess we've yer ma to thank for introducing us. I remember the first time I met her, at that PTA meeting she brought you to. You were only around 9 or 10. I was the principal's secretary, and he'd me there taking notes. I remember after yer ma comin up to me cos we were wearing the same top...she said 'Yer wearin the same top as me. Go home or take it off', and I shot back, ' Go home yerself, and take that wee boy with you. Having him out at this time of night. No da and very little ma I think,' I said to her looking down at you.
Backing; Others who voted for the move included former Labour Culture Secretary Ben Bradshaw, left and former Labour Chief Secretary to the Treasury Lord Boateng, right
This is true with the world. Those, of the world, look highly on its own especially if that one has achieved some great thing. This was true with Simon the sorcerer as we see in Acts 8:9. He used sorcery and bewitched the people of Samaria, giving out that himself was some great one.” But he wanted to work himself up even more so. In verse 18,
He grinned that ten thousand megawatt smile. Exactly, Jen.
Deception always has to hide in darkness. Truth can withstand the scrutiny of daytime and light. Unlike corporate tyranny, Mohawks have nothing to hide.
Sarah M. Blasius
Written by Bobby Miller, Wade Flemons & Barrett Strong.
In a country called Freedonia, the economic power (embodied by the rich widow Mrs Teasdale) chooses the new leader (Rufus T. Fireflies, the most unlikely Prime Minister ever) that selects the most unsuitable ministers and drags his Country into the most useless of wars… nothing to do with today’s news, this is more or less the plot of Duck Soup the 1933 Marx Brothers’ film that many critics at that time disliked also for its political references. Nevertheless, the scene showing the declaration of war on Sylvania and the subsequent explosion of joy (depicted in a crazy musical scene) is, in my opinion, one of the best cinematic representations of the foolishness of war.
The next day, despite finding droppings and gnawings everywhere, I was still in total denial and I didn't think about the mouse again. But that night Tom woke me up at midnight. He looked shaken, and told me that he had walked into the kitchen and spotted a mouse poking his head out of a cereal packet. 'WHICH CEREAL PACKET?' I asked, totally panic stricken. I was inwardly relieved that it had been the kids' Cheerios and not my muesli. Tom told me that he had heroically grabbed the box with the mouse still inside, and given it a good shake. What he was trying to achieve with the shake I don't know, but he said the sound of a mouse thudding around amongst Cheerios was an odd sensation. He went out into the night and bravely threw the box and its dizzy inhabitant out into the garden.
When I got ready to paint, I stood on a chair so I could reach up near the ceiling. Imagine my surprise when I looked down and saw a hidden spot of dirt and grime, the top of my medicine cabinet! For all the times I had cleaned that bathroom, I had forgotten about this hidden area and boy, did it show!
Do you ever wonder how many of those agents click over to see your blog that you mentioned in your query letter? Seriously I'm curious. Has an agent ever click over to check you out? Did they leave a comment and let you know? I'm in the throws of querying now, and I'd love to know what agents think of our blogs. If anyone has ever heard from an agent saying they have checked out your blog, I'd love to hear about it.
Actress, producer, news anchor, talk-show host
I haven't the foggiest idea where to start on this one. So, let me start at the beginning. I was at Borders (aka, my home turf) when I say this book in passing. It caught my eye, and I had to pick it up. Brains, A Zombie Memoir. I laughed out loud (much to the chagrin of the hoity-toity group perusing to my left. Victoriously, I proclaimed to my little guy (a 15 year old who loves Borders almost as much as me) "Ha! This just might be crazy enough to work!" And boy, did it. I, for lack of better terms, engulfed the story, first pass through. Then, I gave it a second pass, and found it just as great. The story is incredibly well paced, humorous, captivating, witty, brilliant, utterly believable, and surprisingly heart-touching. In case you didn't understand, I LOVED this book. It is one of the best books I have read in years, surprisingly enough. I am buying a copy for everyone I know for the holidays, and am certain I will read it at least a dozen more times.
3. Rio red grapefruit, .25/ea. at Sprouts (through 2/9/11)
I have tried loads of times over the years to do videos and have failed miserably everytime...as for 1....I HATE *with a passion* the sound of me voice on video...and 2...Evertime i was talking i would end up laughing...LOL
Congratulations, if you could email me (Mel X at melissajaynecross@googlemail.com) that would be great. I'll sort you out with your fabulous prize from Charmed Cards and Crafts. Don't forget to take your winner's banner from the side bar.
I kind of like it. It gives me goals and indicates where I have missed runs, which makes me feel bad. And I like the lovely lady who tells me when I’m half way there and only have 400m to go…
In a medium bowl, whisk flour, spices, baking powder, baking soda, and salt together.
To help launch our advertising campaign, we're offering a fabulous giveaway to anyone who helps us spread the word.
The Wikipedia article on this specific issue provides reasonably accurate information, but it also omits certain truths. I’ve branded this as a semi-lie because this was in fact the main cause of the protests, -- or to put it more precisely: it was the catalyst the communists (satan’s cronies) were waiting for!
Yield: About 4 quarts
Spoon mixture onto prepared pan. Arrange apple slices over the batter.
Disclaimer : I don’t own the casts, they belongs to God, Shindong belong to himself and his agency. Nari eonni belongs to him. I don’t take any profits of this, nor make money, just to satisfy my wild imagination. Enjoy this!
The National House Price index stood at 85.2 at the end of December 2010 with the average cost of a home being €191,776 (compared with €198,689 at the end of Q3, 2010). The last time it was at this level was in April, 2002.
State governments that have the temerity to demand voters show official identification have been stirring progressives to righteous indignation for some time now. They noisily protest anything that would prohibit the dead, convicted felons and illegal aliens from voting, since those groups are a reliable Democrat party constituency.
Once the bottles were sterilized, the siphony sucker thing was used to transfer wine from the jug into each bottle.
There’s also no multitasking in the iPad because it uses some variant of the iPhone OS. This means you can’t listen to Spotify and browse the web at the same time. No working in Pages while making a VoIP call. And the list goes on…
Does anyone else have this problem?
1 14.5 oz. can pinto beans, drained and rinsed
1 surreptitiously
Bag: Louis Vuitton
Darn. I read (or rather just didn’t read) the directions correctly. Emailed the designer and she set me straight. I was only increasing the thumb gusset on the back of the hand and not doing the increases on the other side. Bummer. Ripped back and did it right.
September 1965 - The First National Association of Evangelicals (NAS).
delivered climax
“In my mind, I knew that, ‘OK, he’s doing his job. You have to eliminate the suspects, so he’s got to tick off these certain questions and get rid of me as a suspect and get on with this thing,’ ” he says.
The last part of the epilogue leaves you scratching your head in confusion. I read it a few times just to make sure I got what the author was saying but it is still too strange.
About: “Talenthouse provides life-changing opportunities for the creative community. It’s a place to participate in projects with leading artists and brands, gain recognition and virally grow your audience. Talenthouse embraces artists at every level of their career, as well as all supporters of the arts. Attracted by the potential for discovering, collaborating with and mentoring emerging talent, many global brands and acclaimed industry icons are involved with Talenthouse by hosting Creative Invites. Brands choose Talenthouse to engage in a dialogue with their audience in a targeted, relevant and credible context. Talenthouse currently focuses on film, fashion, music, art / design, and photography.”
I really do think that this matter should be handled. I feel that my complaint is 100% justified. I am NOT a person to complain about anything... especially Disney related. I can't even send food back at a restaurant if it's poorly cooked. What we're dealing with right now with Disney is an exception to me though. We can't change our travel dates because it would incur a $150 fee per ticket to fly out and back on a different week. We were told something specific, now TWICE, and I feel that they need to hold up to their word. It's about decent customer service and they simply are not offering that right now. This has been SUCH a stress to all of us and it's putting a damper on the excitment that we had going.
I hate clutter. It weighs on you and eats away at your soul. I always wanted two kids (assuming I was blessed with them) and during my last pregnancy I had lovely dreams about shipping off truckloads of baby stuff to the salvation army. Now that my baby is nine months, a lot of her little baby things are no longer practical. She can’t fit into many of the clothes, she’s too big for the infant seats. Finally my time has come to clear up some much needed closet space. And yet I find myself hesitating. I’ve got the boxes out, the clothes sorted, the infant seats lined up and ready for disassembling. Yet… I can’t seem to do it. I want to sooo much but I just can’t seem to do it. I never took myself for an overly sentimental sort. I swear the minute I could put my old jeans on I got rid of all of my maternity clothes.
Me: I think it's something about cheesy lips
While analysts still expect the economy to recover in the second half of 2012, future evidence of weak activity could lead the central bank to follow an expected interest rate cut of 75 basis points this week with another cut later this year.
As I researched more, I found out that there is an option to the fully boned stays of the 18th century. . .half boned stays. I was very interested to read about these on the Marquise site because they are made of an inner layer ("basis") that is boned and then the smooth outer layer and lining are attached so that in the final stays, the bone channels do not show. I decided I wanted to try this style since I didn't have to worry about hand stitching a whole set of stays (since anything visible must be handsewn) only to find out that they did not fit right, or had some other problem.
“Hey moti. Sorry I am late. Gussa wussa toh nai hai tum?” She was trying her best to put up a usual behaviour. Sufi would go berserk if she heard that Shahzeb had reappeared in the scenario. So, it would surely be better if this matter remained under covers, in front of her at least. Iqra would tell her everything after speaking to Arham, but right now, this news had to be hidden from her.
Second wear of my Prepare Guides (last time here). Yes, a repeat item already - I adore these shoes. Holy smokes, they are the most comfortable shoes ever!
that while I learned to create I would
Not everything in F1 is aggressive, extreme, radical or innovative. In fact in many areas the car’s are very close in general design terms. Some time it’s enough just to soak up the detail engineering and explain what all the little bits and pieces do on the car. In this series of short articles, we’ll do just that, thanks to these amazing photographs from MichaelD.
I am no there. I do not sleep. Io non sono lì. Io non dormo.
For further enlightenment on procrastination – I direct you to these excellent blog posts:
Friday May 4th, Saturday May 5th, and Friday May 11th: 8 am-2 pm at the Greenhouse: 6 Greenhouse Road, Kingston, RI 02881. Directions are on our website, cels.uri.edu/uribg Saturday May 12th: 10 am-2 pm at East Farm, Route 108, Kingston. cels.uri.edu/outreach
I've decided that I want to become a ballerina! Just kidding! I'm exploring the possibility of working with the deaf. I want to become a sign language interpreter. Well, that's what I want to do today anyway. Who knows what I will want to tomorrow. All I know for sure is there will be no more dry technical stuff for this lady.
Hail to He Who Is Mighty-Bearded–Rejoice! You are praised!
panic seeping through her body with nowhere to go.
They tasted like a mess, too. I think baking powder is one of those chemical-y ingredients that lingers on your palate for many, many minutes after you have eaten it, especially when you eat it in quantity. Yuck.
I'd better explain. The other day we were talking with our eldest daughter about which days of the week the grandchildren were born on. We had a Monday's child first; and the new babies have been Sunday, Saturday and Friday in that order. You know the old rhyme, don't you? Monday's child is fair of face, etc. So we got to discussing how true the various labels were, in terms of our own family. We thought it was most unfair, and untrue, for poor Middle Daughter to be labelled 'full of woe' (being a Wednesday child), but the others (Sunday and Tuesday) have nice, complimentary descriptions attached to them. I was happy to show off about being a Friday's child - loving and giving. Nice one. I've always thought that was obviously a fair and accurate description of my loving and giving self! (!)
Don’t get me wrong, I love dinosaurs. Like a 5-year-old kid, I am wowed by their fantastic awesomeness. But I don’t study them professionally. I also don’t teach about them in archaeology classes…except to briefly describe why I don’t teach about them.
I know our nameless star outshines them all:
Yesterday while Briella was napping Westly came running toward me hollering something about being three and very loud (;) I gave him my best mean mommy whisper, telling him to talk quietly while Sissy is sleeping. He stopped short and stared up at me saying,
* Xerography: The word for a process to copy documents is xerography.
and i feel really bad. there's some crappy stuff going on out there. some really crappy stuff. but....
The libertarian Cato Institute had a proposal for $1.2 trillion in cuts over ten years.
I am proud to be from a country that has, in the past more than today, opened their arms to the foreigner and the alien. If not, I wouldn’t be here and neither would my wife.
Then we flash back to Mr. Discovers-The-Cenobites, the guy from the first scene who owns the bar, who is having sex with a random chick from said bar. He acts like a douchebag to her afterwards and she gets really surprised for some reason I’m not sure. Did she expect him to sweep her off her feet and marry her? “Oh no, the guy I slept with at a sleazy bar is treating me like crap? HOW UNEXPECTED!” Pfft. Then she gets eaten by the Pinhead statue and turned into a high school biology diorama:
Please note that although offices are situated in Cape Town, South Africa was not included in the latest report.
inside this fairy ring
Pishery-pashery – Nonsense
“Because I love you, you big dork.”
Truth is, we’ve been there since before the ending of Jim Crow. The working definition of white supremacy is the belief that the white race is superior to other races. But it’s not just a feeling of superiority. I’d like to add a sense of white immunity from the societal ills facing all creeds. Let me interject and state that I’m by no means inducting Rick Santorum or Newt Gingrich into the Ku Klux Klan.
How to Coordinate Your Watch With an Outfit
d100 Event
When my little girl decided she wanted to start using a camera I knew I needed to help her. Problem being, my last two digital point-and-shoot cameras are defunct. One broke due to old age, the second broke in a certain motorcyle wreck a while back. Simple math--I didn't have a camera to give her and I certainly don't have the money to rush out and buy her one. So, I did what I had to do.
The agency called on workers, peasants, students, soldiers, retirees and housewives to the parade each May 1 takes place at the Plaza de la Revolution.
I can see where edging is now....
During my 'sorting out phase', I wanted to make my paper scraps a bit more accessible. They were already sorted into poly pockets and put into 2 lever arch files - one for the colours and the other for the metallics, black, white etc - the more neutral colours. These just ended up sitting on a shelf though, so I decided to put an idea I'd had into action. I will show what I did in another post because, as usual, this post is a bit long.
you to hit the broad red
Do you remember the way
Just "someone" is too generic. The clues indicate the killer is someone
In the 10 years since the Guantánamo detention camp opened, the anguished debate over whether to shutter the facility — or make it permanent — has obscured a deeper failure that dates back more than a century and implicates all Americans: namely, our continued occupation of Guantánamo itself. It is past time to return this imperialist enclave to Cuba.
Transfer from cookie sheet to cooling rack or plate.
Dave Douglas trumpet
This Summer has been a bit of a washout. Oh ok, so I'm being a terrible cliché again and discussing the weather, but it seems that we had our Summer in April and May this year, and the majority of the time since then, poor old Blighty has been rather dreary. There has hardly been a day when I've left the house without some kind of jacket which is not how I like to think my Summer should be, and now, still in August, there is a positive nip in the air. I smell Autumn just around the corner. So ladies, of course this means, time to start planning the Winter wardrobe!!
Your consolations cheer my soul." (comfort, real comfort. . .)
Back in 1989, during a conference in northern California, John Cage conceived of a work in which he addressed the concerns he had about improvisation as part of the creative process. Even when he frequently used "chance operations" in his later music, those aleatoric works weren't so much reliant on random in-the-moment inspiration so much as on a performer using Cage's specific instructions to conceive of his/her own composition before a performance. Big difference there! How to Get Started, then, is a special work for him—and, up until Friday, it had been performed only once in public, by Cage himself, during that conference in 1989.
I had extra chopping time since Sofia was with my parents so I decided to tackle Fitness Aficionado’s Clean Eating Quinoa recipe. I use quinoa in my bread but I’ve never enjoyed the process of cooking it, seemed too labor intensive with bringing things to a boil, covering the pot, fluffing, etc.
Activity Block Count = Segment
Mucho gracias
Quite often it is a landowner that approaches the Council (as the relevant planning authority) with a proposal for the making of an LEP. If the Council determines that it will not support or promote the proposal, there is little that a landowner can do at law. For example, and unlike a development application, there is no right of appeal from Council’s decision to not proceed with a planning proposal.
Mary is not alone in her reliance on fallacy to prove her point. If you care to indulge in a little light Googling, I’m sure you’ll be able to find plenty more similar articles which insist that mainstream publishing is failing and suggest ways in which it could be made to succeed.
bud of emotion, quivering in your soul.
8. I really want to start elimination communication from day one, or at least from month one. I find it much easier than diapers, and it's really fun to reach that level of communication with a baby.
I will miss you Premier. Thank you for remembering all those old movies when all I could offer were snippets of information. Thank you for letting me bring my puppy in with me and making a fuss over him. Thank you for always reminding me my movies were due back even if there was an ice or snow storm. Thank you for making me feel safe when it was just me and that really weird guy over on the action aisle in the store. Thank you for being a part of our community. I'm sad to see you go. Good Luck!
Step 2: Enter “YourFirstName YourLastName” in quotes.
I saw one pair of Mallard Ducks, but the female was in the long grasses so I couldn’t get a picture of her, but managed a couple of nice ones of him. Then I saw something on the grass quite a bit in front of me and just wasn’t sure what it was – so I zoomed in to take a picture. I knew when I snapped the pic that it was ducks, but without my glasses didn’t know how many or what kind. Once I got home and looked at the pictures, it was a male Mallard and 2 pairs of Wood Ducks. You have to look closely at the picture to see the 2nd pair. I’ve enlarged the hidden pair in one picture to make it a bit easier to see them. The male is the hardest one to see.
Well, I'm almost packed - just a few more projects before I leave tomorrow morning. If you are attending CHA, please visit and say HELLO! at Spellbinders Paper Arts - Booth #1883.
I bring these points up because I tend to get aggravated whenever someone says to me, "Oh, I could never do that". In response to something our family does differently than theirs. As homeschoolers I hear it a lot meaning be with their own children all day. I really feel bad when they say this in front of their children (or mine). I have realized it also really bothers me because it sounds very final and negative. You don't know what is around the corner if you haven't ruled out things without trying them you have many more options to consider when things change. And things always change.
Neither did Aminadab appear
I doubt either Carling Chrome or Foster’s Gold will regularly discount as it isn’t the point of the exercise. The regular brands are suffering declining sales forcing regular deep discounting and in some respects a decline in brand value as punters get used to a 40 or 50p can of lager and rather than see it as a fantastic bargain and question the value of the product when it isn’t discounted and when it is sold as a premium in the on trade. Cooking lager enthusiast like the decline because it means discounting and cheap grog, a perspective quite different from beer geeks that are desperate to pay more for their pint of pongy vinegar.
So I know this is old news, and many people would be shocked to learn this but I turned 30 in June. It's true. So while this isn't recent news I want to make sure and have this documented in the blog.
Another exciting thing is, they're working on an Advanced Copic Certification Course. Nothing was officially announced, but several comments made during the class definitely point to them actively working on course content for an advanced course.
No more excuses now! God can use you to your full potential. Besides you are not the message, but the messenger. Remember God’s Word says if a man purge himself, he shall be a vessel unto honour, sanctified, and fit for the Master’s use, and prepared unto every good work! (2 Timothy 2:21)
The Tassimo beverage maker is perfect if you enjoy a variety of different hot beverages. Coffee, espresso, cappuccino, latte, hot chocolate, hot tea and more can be made in about 60 seconds with the tassimo machine.
I really never liked the green table. It was too dark to play with minis. Didn´t give a nice spectacle at all. That´s why I decided on a repaint rather than creating this table on it´s reverse.
2. SIR JACK HOBBS (ENG) Right Hand Batsman, Right Arm Medium (1908-30)
This is issued by the National Weather Service when conditions are favorable for the development of tornadoes in and close to the watch area. Their size can vary depending on the weather situation. They are usually issued for a duration of 4 to 8 hours. They normally are issued well in advance of the actual occurrence of severe weather. During the watch, people should review tornado safety rules and be prepared to move a place of safety if threatening weather approaches.
In 2006, my life-long dream of attending the University of Illinois became a reality. I chose to major in agricultural communications with the aspiration of redefining agriculture. I want to help consumers understand the scope of the industry and create a proactive view of agriculture through marketing, communications and public relations.
1925-1927, Deaths: 8000
As a work snack, hummus is somewhat more fraught because of the garlic. You might consider decreasing, rather than increasing, the number of cloves if you have a meeting or important interview. But otherwise I can find few faults in this ancient Middle Eastern dip.
There are a number of Scriptural passages in which the Apostles mention the coming of the end. For example, in Philippians 4:4-5, St. Paul writes: “Rejoice in the Lord always… The Lord is at hand.” St John mentions in 1 John 2:18: “Little children, it is the last hour.” The Apostle Peter says in 1 Peter 4:7: “The end of all things is at hand.” Elsewhere, answering those who said that the end was a long time in coming, St. Peter says in his famous statement that “one day is with the Lord as a thousand years, and a thousand years is one day, and that the Lord is only being patient with us until we repent (II Peter 3:8-9). And then, immediately after that, he gives us a full description of the actual end of the world by fire (3:10-13).
“I noticed a ding on your windshield.” He goes on to talk about, or rather push, for a total windshield replacement.
bet your bottom dollar that tomorrow ....
I would like to say a few things about Christians who compromise with evil… A righteous man is a well of life and a blessing in the land… but if he compromises with the wicked, he becomes like a defiled water fountain. He has muddied the water of life. The word “compromise” has a variety of meanings… In a good sense, this word refers to making a settlement of differences in which each side makes concessions… a difference being settled by a mutual agreement or arrangement… In a bad sense, this word refers to conceding to something detrimental… to something that can expose you to danger or bring you into disrepute. Paul wrote in 2 Corinthians 6:14-18… “How can Christ and Belial, the devil, have any agreement? What can a believer have together with a nonbeliever? The temple of God cannot have any agreement with idols, and we are the temple of the living God” (NCV).
2019.E-IV/24/1970. On current concerns about pollution. University of Chicago Maroon, Chicago, Illinois (corrections: May 1, 1970, p. 6).
Good alternatives are anticipated after an extended search with the (current) firmware can discover exploitable vulnerabilities, however with out the bootrom exploit, every new AppleTV firmware is a good larger challenge, since Apple, of course, consists of the beforehand used weaknesses with the rule instantly.
“Yes, it is rather. Would you mind opening the window, Mr Davison?”
My son has a band concert this week so naturally, he told me that he didn't have black pants or a white shirt that fit yesterday. Thanks for the heads up, hon. So, I took him out to the mall after school yesterday to get the black pants and white shirt that are the required uniform for band concerts.
Hardware/Design:
1 can fat-free evaporated milk
So I always like to keep a pair of dry socks in his backpack, along with winter gloves & a hat.....because this is Alberta afterall.
The anime was started in ’96 and ended in 98′ but it managed to squeeze in most of the important story lines, and some decent filler stories as well. The anime however, did not choose to end the same way as the manga, and it created it’s own alternative ending but somewhat relevant.
Normally I'm bellowing queries are too long. This one is too short --140 words. You can add at LEAST another 100 words before you have to think about stopping, and you could double the word count and still be ok.
Patos, Brazil
courtesy of Pam's kitchen contractor!
Here's how you can help us to save Salt and all our work with hundreds of authors around the world.
Riddle Answer: The letter e.
As chilly as it is this morning, I know
So I focused on the color yellow, and if that color started to slip from my mind, I simply opened my eyes and looked at the fire in the stove, a nice yellow, warm fire. There is more to that meditation if you want to join in just join Heal Thyself.
I found the recipe on a blog called, I Was Born to Cook. Melissa, the blog's author, is my Secret Recipe Club assignment for the month of November. When I searched through her blog, it didn't take me long to decide to make this recipe. After all, it was naturally gluten free, naturally vegan, and made without any processed foods; just that way I like it. Since, the recipe looked quick and easy, I thought, "let me give this one a try."
In Summary: “For more than a generation, the Musqueam have a stated history of a preference to negotiate and have a long history of working towards successful and collaborative solutions. We believe that governments have failed to deal with this critical issue, and this lack of clarity has resulted in unintended consequences. We have expressed our determination to see the site preserved and we will continue that effort with all that it takes to succeed. This site is one of the last and certainly the most significant Musqueam site that connects to our past and to our identity: an identity that was almost destroyed by the Indian Act, residential schools, and other colonial indignities. It is surrounded by a sea of pavement and development that has obliterated almost all of the traces of our past life on our territory.
Yes, soundtracks for books. Now while you're reading about a forest, you can hear THE SOUNDS OF A FOREST. Like, I don't know, birds and whatnot. When Bro McLadiesMan begins playing a mega sweet power ballad for his lady fair, you can listen along. When you get to a super intense part, you get to listen to super intense movie trailer-style music. &c, &c. (There are previews on the Booktrack website if you're interested.)
Singapore do have lots of smaller fan made conventions such as Cosfest and EOY which I never attend because their main attractions are cosplay, which to be frank, is something I kinda dislike about the anime community. However 2008 came and we finally got our first official anime convention. AFA 2008 is actually the best event since its inception because they are just starting up and so they try a lot of things out without catering to any crowd of people. During the event, the thing I liked the most is that we have a panel room where we actually hosts Japanese industry guests like Koji Morimoto, Eiko Tanika and Kunio Okawara.
Is this a sign that some of these words which are used differently by teens could gradually lose their original meaning, as people no longer are aware of them? It hasn't happened to some of the reversed meaning teen slang words like 'sick'; the earlier meanings still stand alongside the new ones, but I'm pretty sure many teens don't know any other meaning for 'blatantly' than 'clearly'.
The submission should include:
Defining the nature of authority seems to be the best place to start. Mason reminded us that even Jesus came as a servant to do His Father’s will, and that any form of authority here on earth is entrusted to us for definite tasks. This imposes mandates and limitations, according to the accomplishing of the assignment. Paul talked about this very thing in 2 Corinthians 13:10 when he stated, “Therefore, I write these things being absent, lest being present I should use sharpness, according to the authority which the Lord has given me for edification and not for destruction.” If Paul had used his title or position of being an apostle to tear people down, it would have been an illegal use of his authority, not given to him or endorsed by the Lord. This clearly shows boundaries in the expression of authority. Mason not only applied those limitations to severe examples that would normally cross people’s minds, but also to the too lenient ones. For instance, it is an unauthorized use of authority to allow children to skip doing their lessons, to play too many video games, or eat too much junk food, because that is harmful to them and our commission is to ensure their best welfare.
When granola has completely cooled, dried fruit can be added. Store in an airtight container.
At least they now know that we are still around.
Halpern said that while women do most of the ‘caretaking’ jobs, such as childraising or helping the elderly, the inequality will remain. But she added that, on the other side, society was losing many talented men on the domestic, caregiving front.
I’ve been away for a while. Held captive by apathy, suppressed by stale politicking, laid low by the cold shoulder of yet another South African winter of discontent.
Bring Me Back launches in PUMA Stores and Outlets across Germany from the 17 April 2012. PUMA Stores and Outlets include among others Berlin, Düsseldorf, Munich, Hamburg, Augsburg and Herzogenaurach. The program will roll out to a handful of additional markets in October 2012, with a full global roll-out slated for January 2013.
Wynkoop Brewing Company Artillery Ale
title of abstract, e) body of abstract
troops deployment to UNAMID in
Just when you thought all the bargain's had been snatched there will be more to find from the 5th January 2012 at the Craft-Room the sale there is really great 25% off everything! Nothing to work out while you are shopping the discount will be taken automatically when you go to check out. Happy bargain hunting.
As is likely evident, there are many parallels between what we’re describing here and the contemporary study of networks. Most scientists working in the field today recognize two primary poles of network organization, namely, distributed networks and centralized networks. The first are messy, inefficient, yet adaptable, able to tolerate difference and change, while the second type are hierarchical, organized, efficient, yet rigid. Nature makes use of both for different situations, and yet it leans strongly to the more distributed side, particularly as organization gets more complex. In situations of extreme hardship and privation, organization and paranoia keeps organisms alive. But in times of plenty, surplus allows for creativity, and its only creativity that can help a species survive when it’s environment changes. Evolution requires both systems, in varying combinations, to preapre for an unpredictable world.
I haven’t been shy about the fact that I often dislike multiple narrators in books, but that was my absolute favourite part of Beautiful Americans. The points of view spiral between our four main characters in almost a cinematic fashion. This allows the reader to both see what the characters are thinking and feeling but also how that character comes across to others, and, as often with people though maybe teenagers especially, contradictions abound. It was seriously well done. Each of the characters' voices was easily distinguishable, and each was very flawed but still immensely likable. I enjoyed each of them which makes the 'picking my favourite' game hard. Alex, Zack, Olivia, and PJ all had their moments of brilliance.
I cannot believe it but Jake is now officially 3.5 years old and Abbie will be 1.5 years tomorrow! We are going to celebrate with green drinks & green cupcakes :)
'White dogs'
Calling this the “politics of sight,” Pachirat’s blood-soaked experience inside a slaughterhouse spotlights only the most illustrative example of how we’ve divorced ourselves from the means of producing violence—and how, in doing so, we have made it psychologically easier to support such brutality. Sadly, billions of factory-farmed animals dying barbaric deaths are just one subset of casualties in that larger process.
Well, there are two ways (okay, there are more than two, but these are the two easiest ways): Weave a net out of vines, or make a spear. They're boys, so which method do you think they chose? SPEARS, of course!
Little man, who will be 6 years old by end March (are you one of those who read my blog since he was 11 months old?) well, he is now in Y1 and unfortunately struggeling quite a bit. Just today we were at the GP to get a referral to a Pedeatrician to run some tests. Seems big class situations and socialising is a bit of a chore for him and he gets in trouble for pushing or hitting or not being very patient. Not a too biggy as yet, the school is really great and supportive and we are all working together to see what makes him tick :-)
This is the top-down model that both of these gentlemen say they’re now against, but they’ve been for, and it does not provide the contrast we need with Barack Obama if we’re going to take on that most important issue. We cannot give the issue of health care away in this election. It is too foundational for us to win this election.
fun grew free for
Reading his post caused me to reflect on my life, the decisions I've made and whether I feel that I've missed out on anything.
( Turkey in the straw)
the #1 above is a mandatory entry. If you do not do this one, no other entries will count.
Next time you meet someone who has sat at Jesus feet – talk with them awhile you will be blessed.
Hoot and Hollar Cart. - Owl & Branch
The Middle East Institute is having a book sale! Culled from the extensive collection of the Middle East Institute Library, items for sale include books, journals, and magazines on the Middle East and ranging in subject from history, political science, and religion to fiction, travelogues, and culture. More than 1,500 books from throughout the Institute's 65-year history will be available for purchase. Most items cost just $1 or $2!
My eyes watched the water line
I’m looking at you, Lou. I know how much you like to whore it up. SO WHORE IT UP!!!
Package for 5 nights / 6 days at select Disney Value, Moderate, or Deluxe Resorts
36. —Money . . . in a voice that rustled. —William Gaddis, J R (1975)
“I wouldn’t do that if I were you,” with that, Andy put her hand over Olivia’s mouth and began climbing up the bed and into the bunk. She got next to Olivia in the bed, keeping her hand over her mouth the whole time. There was barely room for the two of them in the small bunk. The big woman had her leg between Olivia’s legs, her thigh firmly pressing Olivia’s thigh and moving her leg up and down along Olivia’s legs.
Now, let's ask another question - what was the beer that introduced you into the broader orbit of the malt and hop world? Whatever it was, it shook up your expectation and presented a challenge to the taste buds that required re-categorization of beer itself. Beer can taste like this? And so begins a journey that never really ends; the discipline of appreciation. Of course, I'm using beer as the prime example, but the principle is applicable to any number of things. The things we eat, and enjoy, change and shape over the years and it does take years to appreciate certain things. Picky eaters become connoisseurs of things that their fathers couldn't threaten them to eat when they were children. This principle even applies to people, in that it requires discipline (and love) to deal with certain people we interact with on a regular basis. In fact, I would argue that love is the triumph of appreciation and enjoyment for the "otherness" of others, over and above the appreciation and enjoyment for self. Those who appreciate only self are not very likeable people.
‘Apparently, during the 2010 campaign cycle, Schock’s campaign committee paid out $319 for his P90X workout program, writing it off as a health care expense’.
I know nothing of these dreams
Four hours trotting around town, around the park, in the chippy, queuing in the post office, I could have got a lot more done had I not forgot my bank book initially, stupid me! Dozy forgetful me, I had everything ready for geocaching and yet forgot the damn bankbook GRRR!
Your gonna wanna check out the website, as it has some cool music to blog to.
And Brother Jesus, just laughs and chuckles at the weirdness his bride puts on the children.
But I never stopped thinking about Robert Smalls or the project and decided that someday I wanted to write his story as a novel. Early in 2010, I started renewing my research, and Tracy and I even took a quick trip to Charleston and Beaufort, South Carolina, where most of the novel takes place.
Praying for someone to turn off the light
I still only travel by foot and by foot, it's a slow climb,
A few minutes later, she points to a house up ahead "there it is - the one with the white fence." I turn into the driveway carefully, trying hard not to hit the gateposts, trying hard to sneak a look at the house.
recipe from the tummies' kitchen
But I had to turn down an edition in an Arab country which would have involved removing those words and those pictures. My publisher was very understanding, even though no publisher likes to give up a foreign rights deal.
We go to Falmouth's premiere Europhobe bargain department store (no European commissioners are hanging in effigy near the entrance this time, which is nice) and Patroclus buys some curtains. And linings. We have a curtain pole from the last time it all went wrong. I don't know what happened to the curtains.
I will definitely be teaching these cupcakes in my cupcake class this Fall. It is so easy. All you have to do is take butter cream icing, use blue food coloring for color, insert a teddy graham in the candy peach ring, place it in the blue icing swirl, and if you want put a mini umbrella on top of the cupcake for an extra smile. So easy and great for summertime parties! ~
the first time I tried to make it look like light was
Ladle on an extra helping of foodie fun with an appetizing assortment of temptingly tasty Tendertones, nearly black Fluidlines, Studio Careblend/Pressed Powder, Opulash Mascara, two Brushes and nosh-worthy Nail Lacquers in fun, bright shades sure to satiate even the most discriminating gorgeous gourmands.
The tree grew branches to hold up the larger branches on the ground. It’s touching to know this intelligent tree took drastic measures to help its self. We as humans do the same. We will do things to cheer ourselves up. I for one know for a fact a new pair of shoes is a great ‘’pick me up’’ for me. The deeper the pain; the more expensive the shoes become. Sometimes, Jimmy Choo calls my name. But does the pain really go away? Not really. The imprint is still there. We put band-aids all over our soul trying to heal. Sometimes they stick. Sometimes they don’t. Sometimes we can shake it off. Sometimes it becomes so unbearable all we can do is weep as our soul begins to bleed. We are no different than the tree. The tree is no different than us.
She opened the passenger door and sat down, he held out a box of roses to her.
So Arjun escorts Rajiv over to India as his cultural attaché, which comes in handy when some village guy thinks he’s got a claim on bride-to-be Ganga and they decide to play a game of kabaddi to settle the score.
Galatians 6:9
Lil Major and I also go to our Mom's group at church twice a month. I get to eat some yummy food, hang out with the girls, do a devotion and have fun. And Lil Major gets to have fun in the nursery. And as if I needed any more to keep me busy, I'm considering a Monday night women's Bible Study. I've been meaning to get into one for a while, but I feel overwhelmed. Of course, when will I NOT feel that way?? So, I may need to just go for it.
Almighty God, who gave to your apostles Philip and James grace and strength to bear witness to the truth: Grant that we, being mindful of their victory of faith, may glorify in life and death the Name of our Lord Jesus Christ; who lives and reigns with you and the Holy Spirit, one God, now and for ever. Amen.
Immediate reaction #9. Aha, this plot was also designed to serve as yet another reason for pushing the populace even further in the “big Brother” direction by making “thoughtcrime” an official crime.
“It’s hard, isn’t it?”
Our VOTED winner will also win THREE SINGLES of choice or 1 single and 1 4x6 set!
Our daily routine has certainly had a few changes in 2012. We made the decision at the end of last year for me to resign from my Wednesday working day for a few reasons, biggest of those being the travel. I was driving 150km each Wednesday with our little boys in-tow, so I could teach, which became very taxing on all members of our family. We also had to factor in Kindy this year and because of our location, I'd be transporting our son to and from school, two days a week so he can attend 4yr old school. Unfortunately he doesn't yet qualify for the bus run to be re-routed so Mum's taxi it is!
First up, I started the morning with a bowl of oatmeal with flax seeds and coffee. I hung out for an hour or so checking email and reading blogs, then it was time to gather up my stuff and hit the trail.
I occasionally listened to the music and looked up wikia entries on Silent Hill, even though I had never played the games. That's how much of an impact the movie had on me.
It's not a superpower at all. I would like to be able to play the piano again. I miss playing it but I daren't sit at it. I never learnt how to read music, nor was I ever interested in doing so. Ear was what led me to the blacks and whites and I hope one day to recover that super power again and be guided to the piano by my ear.
14. No Fun
I did well yesterday. I've decided that Thursdays will be Wine Night as Thursdays suck at work and I need it by Thursday night. I did indulge in one glass of Moscato last night but it was totally worth it. Came in about 100 calories over the goal but no worries there. Ate paleo all day and logged accordingly.
According to trademark laws, it is is illegal to sell a product which may fool one into thinking they are buying the real McCoy. Thus, it is a stretch to say that baidu condoms would be confused for baidu the search engine, but Jordan’s image and name being sold on sneakers and clothing is outright theft.
But today, I got an email from them asking if I was going to participate again this year. And immediately I knew I wanted to.
First, one must decide on the gravity of each brew. For this example, we'll go with, say a Barley Wine and a table beer. Coincidence, I think not! Let's say we're shooting for a 5 gallon batch of Barley Wine with a starting gravity of 24.22P and 3 gallons of table beer at 7.3P. To figure out the target gravity of the "mother ale" as I call it, use the following formula.
The extremely full grocery cart.
I know---fighting a battle for our hearts seems more like something out of a romance novel than an article on rules of engagement. But if you and I are going to move through the losses of life, we must devise and be intentional about executing a battle plan to care for our hearts after losses assault. In other words, we must learn the rules of engagement.
Further, I don’t know that he is promoting legislative change in response to the sexual revolution (admittedly, he is advocating legislative conservatism with gay marriage, but he seems to struggle greatly with this). I think his hope is that as Christians would gather around historic, stable truth and beauty, it might cause them to see the greater value of those things that the sexual revolution has inherently de-valued: children, marriage, and the sanctity of our bodies and sexualities. He wants a change of culture; he doesn’t want to reject, as Sessions puts it, “the advancement of women”.
I sigh and jump down from the building where I stay to spy on him. I walk (or run) fast and stop right in front of him, enough to make the cold Kim Junsu surprised. He looks straight to my eyes after control his surprised. His lips a bit pale and his nose and cheek shade red because of the coldness.
What I liked about Airplane:
Now that you know this, it’s probably best you keep it to yourself.
I regret the lack of impact I and other people have had in getting progress in Sittingbourne town centre. I keep the numerous documents the Council has produced over the last 10 years as a reminder.
If you just guess at random, you are very unlikely to find a nontrivial factor this way; you’ll just keep getting back “” from your computer. This method is no better than just directly guessing prime factors of . Modern factorization techniques are based on choosing in clever ways to increase the odds of a hit. For example, Pollard’s method is based on computing for certain carefully chosen and . The various methods that are out there increase the odds of finding a useful GCD to well above random chance, but they are still very long odds, which is why factorization is hard.
When I was adding the link to Summerfete I saw she had written a quick tutorial on this technique (except her shapes look right unlike mine) which is called English Paper Piecing apparently. If you want some patchy inspiration I heartily suggest you pop on over to visit these ladies too.
but since the living room and dining room flow into each other,
The topics of regrouping in addition and regrouping in subtraction are now split so that 2-A contains regrouping in addition, and 2-B contains regrouping in subtraction.
"2. Freedom of Election: any party allowed - except one advocating the end of democracy"
Can you believe this really happening?! We're not sure that we can!
David Kempsell
I did cover it with a carrier bag which i always think helps and i left it on just over the recommended 30 Min's.
xoxo Irishgirlieknits
In the Grimm's tale, our heroine is originally eaten along with her grandmother, before the huntsman comes along and saves them both by cutting them out of the stomache, from which they emerge. This appears like passive women waiting helplessly for a man to come and save them, but it was actually Red's idea to fill the wolf's stomache with stones afterwards, which she then did, disempowering the wolf and eliminating him as a threat.
Legend says that many centuries ago the Sun begged the Moon to cover him for a while so that he could have the chance to leave the heavens and wander freely around Earth. The Sun no longer wanted to be the center of the universe and wanted to be able to go unnoticed among all the living creatures.
We all can do with some cheering up from time to time and there is nothing like a bunch of daffodils to make you smile.
Finally, which rhymes with enough,
I finally figured out where to comment, and then I see the word verification (barely), but then the box is cut off prematurely...so I cannot submit it...its missing! Probably why you are not receiving comments, do you not know this needs fixed??
There is no sugar added, so if you favour a sweeter oatmeal, you can add a little brown sugar or honey, but we found it delicious as is. The banana and apple add a natural sweetness, and you can serve it with fresh fruit or a drizzle of maple syrup as well.
This mighty globe was made for you alone.
It’s not, as commonly thought, money. No, the root of all evil, in my humble opinion is the business management tool SAP. Has there ever been a more time stealing, soul destroying, life-erasing entity of rancid, bowels of hell stinking pointlessness? Answers on a post card please, although I suspect not. There are almost limitless ways this foul, pernicious company can make the average workers life more difficult and stop them getting any work done.
"No," William said. "I'd say, 'You've got the prettiest face I've ever seen."
And fight till the future is once again mine…!!!”
Douglass founded dendrochronology or the science of tree ring patterns. Scientists use a non-destructive method of sampling whereby they carefully extract pencil width cores from living trees. And by counting each annual ring, which contains a lighter band of early-wood and a darker band of late-wood, researchers are accurately able to determine the tree’s age.
Filled that empty spot with willing participants.
Just be sure you give your visitors a simple way to opt outside of mobile marketing messages. Options for example codes to text for being taken off a distribution list make interaction easy. Even if customers choose to stop receiving mobile messages, they’ll likely do not forget that you’ve made it simple and easy are more susceptible to opt way back in as long as they view the value inside your messages.
and had to sing so many times that week,
Jalapeno Cheese Sauce
Right now, I go all of Monday without seeing Tommy. And he is still asleep when I leave for work on Tuesday mornings. It's hard on my mommy heart and I often wonder what messages he is getting from my being gone. Because the reason I am gone all day and all night on Mondays is to be a part of a ministry I feel passionate about and called to and that's at the expense of missing out on him for an entire day. Kids interpret things in their own way and I often wonder what he think about this in his young, formative mind.
So why have I been musing on fitting in? Mainly because I joined this site, StyleMob.
So instead, you get the childhood story I told Zach last night.
It is surprising what is and isn’t popular amongst your posts. You’ll find that something you thought would definitely bring in the crowds, such as Presidential Material: Barack Obama (during the election season) and Lady Chatterley’s Lover goes cold (who doesn’t like reading about ladies getting off with gamekeepers?). Others that are seemingly obscure, such as ‘Black Magic, White Noise’ and Mucha, receive a great response. Though I have never bothered planning my reviews around what I thought would get good hits (I just write about books that produce some kind of response in me), I now know that even if I had tried I would have failed miserably. It’s utterly unpredictable.
A follow up post left some of us wondering if they were made by French lighting designer Jean Royere, who made these lovelies below, priced at about $30,000 each. So beautiful, but...yikes.
Rewarded for completing each of the firework color deeds = 1 Anniversary Token + The title of “Master Blaster”.
So - these 471 proposals are taking a little more time than I originally thought. There is a lot of very, very promising material here and there's a hell of a lot of work that's gone into most of these.
In addition to being part of today’s Indie author movement, Alicia and Roy Street are also traditionally published. In 2009 they received a Daphne Du Maurier Award for Excellence in Mystery/Suspense. They both share backgrounds in the performing arts. Alicia spent years as a dancer, choreographer and teacher. Roy in theater and standup comedy. Alicia is a chronic reader of every genre including the classics. She also loves old black-and-white movies, making organic soups from recipes she invents, working out and, of course, dancing. Roy’s into sweaty workouts, too, as well as watching boxing on HBO and eating Alicia’s organic soups. Their cat’s name is Wallace, an orange ten-pounder who’s crazy over pizza. He and Roy do slices every Friday night.
So the principal got up and spoke and then we prayed followed by going through the line to get lunch. Tbug grabs my hand and said, "I'm going through the line with you." So she and I got our food and then made our way back to the table.
The police rely on you to give them new info about gang members and drug dealers in your 'hood, and you are neither.
But with my recent blocks on the story, we felt it was time she read it and maybe she could be a sounding board on what may be off. She has always been good at giving me a nugget of an idea that I can run with and expand on. Without her, “Hiroko’s Tale” probably wouldn’t be the story it is today.
Can you believe that February is here in only a few days?
Favorite class to teach? That’s a tough one! I love teaching all my classes. Let me run down the list:
Having read 6 of the 11 books that I took out of the library last weekend, I had another book on hold for me. Cassandra Clark's second novel "A Parliament of Spies" is one that I just have to read. I also purchased 2 books this week for various reading challenges:
The amount of free acid in British beer appears to be uniformly larger than in the Viennese or Bavarian beer, and sometimes it is very much larger. This free acid is represented in the tables as acetic acid; but there is reason to believe that only a part of it is acetic acid, and that beer probably contains lactic acid and some substance analogous to glucic acid, which, according to Graham, Hofmann, and Redwood, appears to be produced in the fermentation of beer-worts, as practised in this country.
3. Brodus Clay v. Dolph Ziggler
What are your reading goals?
4. Carbo-loading paradise. I’ve already had a bunch of pasta this week, and didn’t buy chocolate when I went grocery shopping Sunday so I didn’t scarf a bunch of it. Tonight I plan on making chicken and mashed potatoes (and I’ve been eating a crapton of spinach. I’m on a bit of a kick, not that that’s a bad thing. It’s spinach after all!) that will hopefully also make my lunch tomorrow. I’m going to see ‘Legally Blonde’ the musical tomorrow night with some girlfriends and we’re getting happy hour burgers and beer, so I’ll have to try to behave myself a little bit more after that. NB and I are still planning on pancakes for Saturday night, since that worked excellently before Just a Short Run.
“I never question the integrity of the SPR process. There is no way you can tamper with the ballot box,” he told the Borneo Post.
She didn’t answer me, but her square face was working on something other than words. I believe she was trying not to cry.
I added a gem flourish to the tag along with some little Recollections flowers and yellow crochet lace. The seam binding was crinkled and coloured with Dusty Concord Distress Stain.
I’ve been going around in circles for months trying to squeeze every nuance of plot and character development, creating new folklore, and recapping the previous book to the point where I forgot what I was writing about. It happens sometimes and when it does, that key ingredient that makes writing fun begins to die. But just like everything else in life, the writing process is a lesson. Coming out of that fire unburned yet reeking of smoke, I began to evaluate what I’ve learned.
...Exactly MY sentiment. Just ask my ass.
He was so good we decided to take a seat and have a refreshing beer whilst enjoying his singing. We took a short video of him but for some reason Blogger won't let me upload it, so I've put it on You Tube and you can see/hear it here.
This means choosing either a selection of brews or a single selection and plenty of it.
Minotaur, Jul 19 2011, $26.99
Whaaaaatttt? Jason Russell is the leader of a group called, Invisible Children. He’s also an incredible filmmaker. For well over 10 years, his non-profit has been trying to draw attention to Joseph Kony in Uganda. Joe Kony is an a-hole, plain and simple. He manipulates kids, makes them kill their parents, disfigures them, and puts them in his army. He has basically set fire to a reign of terror throughout Uganda. Today, Kony has been pushed back into the Congo. The Invisible Children guys and Jason Russell are extremely dedicated to this cause – fanatically so.
* Put the butter in a mixer bowl and cream until smooth and creamy using a paddle attachment.
Neither Rich nor I are verbally acknowledging their presence.
I WILL NOT BE BOUGHT!!!!! i understand money is necessary, only because people are so fucking caught up in the imaginary bubble of thinking it’s real. No, MONEY = POWER and if you give your money away to frivilous shit, you are giving your POWER away, I just hope you know what you’re spending it on. BUY YOURSELF! DON’T SELL YOURSELF, it’s practically prostitution, just without the sex.
“I am not going to wade into constitutional law,” Sebelius responded. “We are implementing the (health care reform) law that was passed by the Congress, signed by the president, which directed our department to develop a package of preventive health services for women.”
F: Oh dear, if you say I breed ponies, it makes me sound very professional and I am still learning every day! I love to be with horses, I try to ride most days, we have the space here so I started this project three years ago. My daughter Charlotte, who is 15 also rides, and competes, so it is an interest we can share, even though I know that at her age she has other priorities too!
Story by Greg Berlanti, David Leslie Johnson, and Dan Mazcau
It's still chaotic.
Update 'A-Z Reviews' page
As a writer, you must escalate the tension and draw it out. Remember when I said how your protag must face a conflict or challenge they can't easily solve? Sure you do, because your loyal followers of this series. *wink*
Written by me when I was 16 years old. I enjoyed this short story, so I have decided to share it. Reflecting on some of the things I have wrote in the past amaze me. Do any of you go back to something you once did or wrote & are like “Did I really write this or that?” & “Did I really do that?” I feel like my writing style has a similar voice and has slowly evolved and matured.
Don't be sad for me....I'm not.
Here's a closer view of the lovely mermaid, with her long and overflowing hair, as she rests on a slice of moon that's she has lovingly decorated with hanging hearts.
I don't necessarily. I think Isabella is staying with her mom and dad this weekend, so I get some alone time.
If you use social media, such as Twitter, Facebook, etc., there are some direct links you can click after you’ve bought the book to help promote your review.
Dear Weekend,
“Hey,” said Ann, but Chris motioned for her to stop.
As the boys are wrestling, they knock over the toy bins that they have set up to keep all their toys organized and the toys go everywhere. Finally they finish wrestling and just look at each other, exhausted and out of breath. They both start looking around and realize that their room was a giant mess. Well, actually they looked around and thought, wow that looks like fun, but they knew that mommy and daddy wouldn’t be happy. Both of them at the same time had an idea.
grades were all sociable with each other. Kids were giggling and
- The challenge will be every Monday
Greek Beef Kebabs
MESSAGE FROM the I AM Universal Consciousness
the dreams of her so much more vivid than life
makes you stronger
Might just be a big coincidence and pigs might fly.
"My word! What a machine! Tell us what it is and how it works."
7) Fool's Paradise
With each passing year more and more information is gathered surrounding football, head injuries and their long term impact. In 2000 it was discovered that 60 percent of players had suffered at least one concussion and that more than a quarter of all players had suffered 3 or more. Acccording to the New York Times:
Below is a detailed list of companies engaged in bond sales during the second half of 2011 (data as of August 1, 2011). (ms)
New beer time! This round is a collaboration between Redhook Brewery and the Emerald City Supporters who are the loudest and proudest of the Seattle Sounders fans.
The day after Victoria died, I took that bottle down from the shelf. I ran my fingers over the label and wrapped my fist around the bottle. I thought about the pain and hopelessness of loss, and about how good it would feel to just make it all go away for a little while. I took the cap in my grasp and started turning it. It moved just a little bit, and I felt the paper seal straining in my grip, almost ready to tear. My brain started telling me lies. "Go ahead," it said. "Just one drink will make you feel better." And I started to believe it.
” Yeah sure,just don’t give me a look which shows how eager you are to give me a reason.Again ! ” I wiped the tears away,caressing their nimble,ephemeral warmth.
Barbour: a brokered convention is
Like Sunset Blvd., the namesake of Billy Wilder's Hollywood horror story from 50 years before, Mulholland Dr. feels like a living piece of the city's history. Unlike Wilder's route to disaster however, there's not much reason to take Lynch's winding artery through the Hollywood Hills unless you're one of the lucky few who have a home there or, like me, you wish you did. Literally and figuratively rising above the city glittering beneath, it's the pinnacle of Hollywood and Lynch's film immediately taps into the dream/nightmare that it represents.
Merchants are the middle man for credit card payment when someone buys something from you site. The most important thing to check before you sign up with any merchant is, their charges.
The holiday is "President's Day" in Alaska, California, Colorado, Hawaii, Idaho, Maryland, Nebraska, New Hampshire, Ohio, Oregon, Tennessee, Washington, West Virginia and Wyoming. It's "Lincoln/Washington/Presidents' Day" in Arizona; "George Washington's Birthday and Daisy Gatson Bates Day" (who?) in Arkansas; and "Presidents' Day" in Hawaii, Massachusetts, New Mexico, Oklahoma, South Dakota, Texas, and Vermont. Maine calls it "Washington's Birthday/President's Day," while it's "Presidents Day" in Michigan, Minnesota, Nevada and New Jersey. The holiday is "Lincoln's and Washington's Birthday" in Montana; "Recognition of the birthday of George Washington" in North Dakota; "Washington and Lincoln Day" in Utah, and "George Washington Day" in Virginia.
Jeez, only 14 pieces? I feel like I did way more than that, maybe some will turn up in the future.
Fast forward a few months (just in time to leave the Arizona heat for an Alberta winter....figure that one out???) and now my parents have grand plans of moving.....somewhere....when their house sells. They want to watch tv but do not want to have a satellite contract. My Dad asks me to add his receiver to my bill. No problem. I am not sure if it is legal or not but that is another story. Then he asks what kind of programming we have. In an effort to save some coin we cut back our satellite service over a year ago. We had more than peasant vision but we aren't high rollers here.
Besides eat good Chinese food or go shopping in a Korean supermarket.
I could spend three dollars
I have updated this poem but will not be posting the new revisions …
6- Infrastructure: Have you forgotten about the $1 TRILLION stimulus that did NOTHING to Stimulate the economy? It just added $1 Trillion to the debt + interest. And you Liberals want more?
The first time was Halloween... I thought 'she has the right idea'
RR: The band formed in 2007, how did the band start and before forming this band were you involved with any other groups?
Today is Black Friday, the start of that period which most retailers have waited for all year.
i Realized
All of our Design Team's inspiration is listed above, along with Inlinkz. This challenge will run until Sunday May 20, 2012 at 6pm CST. And for an added bonus, we will be looking for some works of art to Spotlight!
Take a good look at your company and what you have to offer. Then, take a good look at your target market. When you decide which type of style to use, you need to consider your audience first, as these are the people who will be reading your marketing collateral. Determine what type of writing style is most effective to your target audience. Do they prefer persuasive pieces, informative pieces or maybe even narrative pieces? Once you know what your readers want, you can start writing to this desired style.
I don’t have a cell phone. I have very little interest in changing this.
I think I'll go month by month through the pictures. . .
The devastation of three hurricanes…destroyed much of this home…. But not it’s family or it’s soul.
THE NERVE!
All the authors were wonderful they looked great and were friendly to all. However I went with focus and purpose to see two of my favorite authors Jeaniene Frost and Pamela Palmer. Not to mention if I would have spent as much as I did at the last signing my husband would have keeled over, so I only got two books. I’m still pouting a little over that. But what happens on kindle stays on kindle, it won’t hurt him, and I’ll secretly still be feeding my addiction (evil smile). Not to mention I got to cancel my pre-orders of their books and get them a few days early signed by the authors! Woooohooooo!
Work all day – then come home & exercise or fall on my face. Yup. Totally thrilling.
The secret to that is your personal choice of individuality and style. It’s about picking the pieces that would flatter your figure and even your lifestyle should be considered on your choice of fashion. Some cuts would either complement your look or will drag you down that’s why it is so important to understand the basics to look for as you start to build your wardrobe.
While shopping in Nidus the party encountered a giant egg with ex-pirates paying people to defecate around it (to keep it warm). This amused us because it was one that the veteran players remembered fondly from many sessions ago. The party talked a bit with the pirates and found they belonged to a fourth un-named pirate crew but they had words of dire warning about Suicide Jack.
* The Disability Benefit claiming wino who managed to visit vineyards throughout the world and fraternised with celebrity wine enthusiasts such as Mick Hucknall, Gerald Depardieu and Cliff Richard while being able to shell out for "some decent-ish vintages."
YES its time to do another FRIENDS swap. I have had people asking about when we were doing this swap again so here we go. Everybody in the past has enjoyed it and were looking forward to the "next" one.
*God, please use my blog to touch the lives of those who read it. If anyone reading this today does not know You, please touch their hearts and guide them to your Glory. Amen
When Malcolm's Wine was finished, Gilmore sent out something like a hundred queries to agents (agents are far harder to acquire than publishers), with no luck. So at the urging of friends he self-published the book. In February, a friend who runs a literary arts center held a book launch for him.
I'm not a "foot" or "footwear" guy. An attractive woman is attractive whether she's wearing boots, shoes, sandals, sneakers, or no shoes at all. And I don't really care about heels - high heels, low heels, flats...it's all the same to me. But there's just something about high leather boots that I really like - and that I also can't explain why I like.
Otherwise, generally, every prisoner was called umdlwembe, a political bandit.
My goals and life values
Southern Taste
Jealousy sets in and loose strands caress your skin and all I can do is be a
“Namaste Bhabhiji, uncle has sent these bags. He will come a little later.” He said to her.
So... I've googled pictures of wolves as if they are jumping down onto the ground off something. I will have them on my lower back, opposite of each other, one white and one black. Here are the pics I like:
Try this site, you'll like it!
Fill with hot water, making sure it comes up at least half way up the sides (bain-marie its called) and gently place on the middle shelf of the oven.
Hey ! Hello.........
5. How do you promote your designs?
You say it be your last
memories of passion, memories of alienation
Let’s consider the role of poetic truth in ancient society. On this basis, we can understand how Socrates challenged the poetic paradigm.
7.) Fish-Fishan
11. So Long To The Red River Valley
Okay, just one other thing. I liked the place, and I wish it well, but trying to get around in downtown Wilmington just about did me in. Some idiot planner thought it would be a good idea to narrow all the streets, and push parking out to the edge of the commercial area, and just generally make it inconvenient to drive. Well, forget your suburban traffic, guys, and there's not enough city there to make this work. Wilmington's got to be more welcoming to visitors, because after this experience...I don't really want to go back, no matter how cool this place is.
I started falling in love with you the moment I began to exist.
I'm leaving sight behind
But if it becomes too much of a pain in the butt, then after we are done having kids, I might just say to hell with it all and give up my US citizenship.
And I cried and prayed some more…and I got on facebook, cause that is where all mind numbing takes place for me….
I'll lock your jaw til you cant talk
Mark Jardim, 39, New York, N.Y.
"But, there's other babies in there. No ones ever asked to do this before."
My goal was to complete the base set and pick up the parallels of my favorite players.
(photos taken a few nights ago of the super moon)
I am so happy that I have a brand new baby nephew to share these books with. These books are reviewed as "a must for every savvy parent's nursery library," and I must say that my brother and his wife are bound to be savvy parents. They need these.
So how does shopping while your hungry apply to this? I thought a tip of a different kind might be helpful this week.
Pinsky said, “We believe it is competitive information.”
Anyway poor EJ isn’t feeling 100% what with sore that and poorly head and cough so was in bed by 8pm with medicine and an ice pop.
Danielle
Letter to 2012 Graduates from the Provost
So ladies there you have it – you can look like a model too – remember these tips for flattering photos this Christmas and I do hope it’s a lovely one!
Getting better, but still has lard and some other not so great things in it - Option 2: Add 3/4 cup juiced pulp of carrots and apples to 1 box jiffy corn bread meal. Replace the egg with 1/2 mashed ripe banana and add 1/2 cup applesauce. Add the milk, and bake for 20 mins.
“Here comes the sun,” they sang on their landmark 1969 album Abbey Road. “It’s alright.”
For the life of me, I can't seem to write a query from the main character's POV. I've tried it from the antagonist's side and find that I like this much better:
Of folk he ought to meet,
The Intellectual:
Allie congratulations!!!!!!
digi, Recollections papers, DCWV and Recollections cardstock, Prismacolor Pencils (email me for complete color list), Martha Stewart Monarch Butterfly punch, Recollections pearls. Tools: sewing machine.
Have I seen them?
Christian tells Jack that everything that happened to him was real, so this includes "Island" events, Flashes, and the Oceanic 6 craziness. Hmmm...Perhaps it was only as real as he made it. Even if it was a matrix/virtual or physical with simulations incorporated, or a real mystical island, or metaphysical planes, and/or states of consciousness, all of those still count as a real experience for them.
In my past I could feel fine,I could feel the same as now but i controled it,,but the past year was a year full of hard times,several scares that fortunly all was discarted....I figth trying to go on,I am not a good friend because I am locked in my world of fear....this is why I stop create cards,and living with joy...I do have things to live with joy,perfect marriage,my family complete,in two weeks my second grandchild will be born and this fills me joy,however I don't feel good.....I pray for this,but I can't overcome this....
Essentially Ecclesiastes 12 speaks of a life with and without God. CS Lewis wrote: “There are only two kinds of people in the end: those who say to God, ‘Thy will be done,’ and those to whom God says, in the end, ‘Thy will be done’.” *
OK I'm probably over doing this - but it begs the question and in this world of spin doctors and image consultants you have to wonder who let this question get asked ?
So, the plan is for us to go back there in a few weeks for Ricky to have four of his permanent teeth pulled out to make room for four other permanent teeth that have no room to come in. Once that is done, he can have orthodonture. That's another fun thing to come... Do we pay out of pocket for ortho stuff down here, or do we try to get Medi-Cal to pay for it under medical necessity and do it through UCSF? That would mean going up there every time he needs and adjustment, which would be a pain in the butt. It's an hour away and well, it's in San Francisco, with lots of traffic. Guess we'll see.
It's a challenging time: the last week of classes means it's time to return all the papers I collected just before & just after Thanksgiving break as well as teach the last few texts of the semester and review for final exams. The committees & groups I'm in are trying to have one last meeting or two before the end of the semester. I've got senior portfolios, and freshman paper revisions come in soon. On the assessment committee we're doing the university writing assessment (part one earlier this evening, part two next week, both multi-hour meetings).
The words still rang in her ears. She was trembling when she heard Shahzeb’s voice last night. This was the voice she loved listening to. This was the voice she dreamt of every night. This was the voice she wanted to hear on every morning of her life. And this was the very voice which confessed that it now belonged to someone else.
Hope you can play along with us this week.
So yesterday I got a phone book on my door step. I mean, really? A phone book? Who uses those things anymore? I decided I needed to put this phone book to good use.
There’ll be a tough time in the old town tonight
4.) You read Horse Fly religiously because you want to stay informed
There’s no judgment at all to how you answered these questions. Simply notice that work means different things to different people. I respect that. But when it comes to ‘overtime’ I think your responses to these and other related questions might shed some meaningful light with respect to how you feel about your time at work.
So I'm taking French literature, a French film class, methodology (where you learn how to be a French student) and ... drum roll.... PSYCHOLOGYY!!! yay! i am very excited about this because I really missed learning about psychology, the most interesting thing on the planet. It gives me a break from learning about French culture all day. My one psych class is Developmental Psych, all about the development of the brain from infants to adulthood. And, I feel like I really have come a long way cause I can understand about 80% of the lectures on a good day. Oh and another added bonus is that I go to a separate campus for psychology, which is 18923748932 x better than my other campus (which looks like a post-war zone). This is me in front of la belle fac à Bordeaux 2:
I'll end with this.
To upload an image of your own, select the drop down menu at the side of the 'Background' button and at the top left of the pop out, you'll see a box that says 'Upload Image'. You then simply select your file and you'll be shown a preview of how it will look on your blog.
Basically, I was sold on the idea of barefoot running and the natural stride. However, wasn’t quite ready to take plunge yet. Vibram Five Fingers (aka gloves for your feet) were my first option, but an ebay stuff up later and after reading a few running blogs I got second thoughts and decided to switch to ‘transitional’ shoes first. These are shoes which are typically less structured than the common running shoe, have wide toe box or toe area to allow toes to splay naturally and have lower heel to toe drop (typically 4 mm). Well, after scouring many shoe reviews (and I mean hours and hours of browsing) I have narrowed down my choice to a particular shoe, which I won’t mention here. But when I walked into the shop, I spotted these beauties, decided to try them on… the rest is history.
Wage – Equivalent Worth
When you really see Jesus, I defy you to doubt Him. If you see Him when He says, “Let not your heart be troubled . . .” (John 14:27), I defy you to worry. It is virtually impossible to doubt when He is there. Every time you are in personal contact with Jesus, His words are real to you. “My peace I give to you . . .” (John 14:27)— a peace which brings an unconstrained confidence and covers you completely, from the top of your head to the soles of your feet. “. . . your life is hidden with Christ in God,” and the peace of Jesus Christ that cannot be disturbed has been imparted to you.
As part of the ‘Take 5’ campaign to reduce exam stress, LLR are taking part in various schemes to promote study skills literature and help with referencing. See http://www.ntu.ac.uk/student_services/study_support/exam_stress/events_timetable/index.html for more information, as well as various promotional materials which will be advertised.
Carol Flyzik, 40, Plaistow, N.H.
I could hear her thinking….
3. Add anything else you’d like to have in your final stock. I often use the remnants of last nights vegies, the tops of my celery, the nibs of peas, the head of carrots (plus anything in the fridge that is looking tired or floppy). You could dice up carrots, leek, parsnips, turnips, celery, and add some rosemary too! These make the stock tastier but arent critical, you can always add things later when you use the stock for cooking
Wow, a long 9 hr drive from Maryland, but we finally made it!
-The Jokes: Seth annoyed me with his Seth-ness only once or twice. B-
The number one emotional sales weakness hidden from view is called Non-Supportive Buy Cycle. (And it’s not the thing you ride.) Simply put – how a salesperson buys things will DIRECTLY 100% correlate into how he will sell things. Understanding this weakness requires a tremendous degree of open-mindedness. It is an extremely powerful weakness but very difficult to accept. While almost all salespeople will agree with the definition of how they buy, it usually takes some time before they understand and accept the impact that Buy Cycle has on the way they sell.
L’Arc~en~Ciel reveals details on new album + live concert in Hawaii Kikkawa Yuu holds special Christmas event as ‘Kikka Santa’ AKB48’s Sashihara Rino to star in a drama for the first time Official performance order revealed for this year’s ‘Kohaku’! Check out the track lists for SCANDAL’s new single + best album! CardCaptor Sakura Wedding Dress Goes Down Runway Nozomi Tsuji Separates from Husband
When our cuisine was pork and beans, baloney and day old bread.
So if you're reading this, odds are very good that I'm home watching the kiddo. But that's okay, really. It's all part of the Joyous And Fulfilling Bonding Experience that is life as a parent.
Panel 7: No, that’s not Malcolm; it’s Dr. Fischy again, or is supposed to be anyway. Catson definitely had an eye and nose when I penciled him, but this is a case where my erasing worked a little too well, and apparently I didn’t ink it in properly. The bearded man sitting across from him can only be Bill Steingarten, the head of BioSyn, mentioned in the novel, but only making an appearance in the Topps comics:
It's Dare to Get Dirty week over at SCS - if you're a fan club member come on and join the fun!!! :) All the details can be found HERE! I'm a little late off the mark and I've started by combining 3 of the challenges because I've been very ill this week beginning with a bad asthma attack Wednesday and then spending most of Thursday unconscious thanks to a severe migraine. Normally I would try not to combine challenges but I really don't want to push my already fragile head. Soooooo, I've combined Becca's, One Happy Stamper's and KrystieLee's challenges.
On our boat, at the marina.
Whenever I see one of these films, as much as I am enjoying the story itself, I am loving every exterior shot, wanting to see how much of these locations are left the way they looked in the film. Sometimes those places are gone and only film preserves their memory, but lucky enough, some locations are still left with some semblance to years past.
I say to the candidates. Don’t kid yourself. You will be attacked. You will be smeared. You will be lied about. You will be threatened,” Gray said. The cybernats and the bedsit bloggers will call you traitor, quisling, lapdog and worse. They will question your appearance, your integrity and your sexuality. They will drag your family and your faith into the lies and the vitriol. It will be worse if you are a woman.
Last week I got a text message telling me I was subscribed to a Fun Facts service for $9.99 a month. That night I called our carrier to find out what was going on. After navigating through the automated phone maze I was connected with a real person, and found out I'd actually been charged!
Once locked down to the none tidal Ouse we turned left at the sailing club to fill with water and empty the toilet tank. Thanks EA for free pump outs. Once this was done it off to new grounds for us into the relief channel lock and down onto the relief channel. This lock is all button operated and hydraulically powered with a control station at each end. As we we were leaving the lock I spotted a crab sitting on the lower safety chain below the surface. I have never seen a crab in fresh water before.
Beethoven’s 4th 2001 Hollywood Movie Watch Online : Movshare Link : Alternative Link :
These little differences and distinctions make life interesting. But think about how 'diversity', so-called, contributes to the changing of our patterns of speaking.
There’s a quiz near the beginning of the book that I pretty much failed. LOL. But, the rest of the book goes on to explain the reasons in more detail. (If that sounds confusing, you’ll just have to read the book to understand!)
(Couldn’t believe it made 3 medium-large pancakes per serving for under 250 cals each too! And mine had nearly 19g of protein per serving for just over 20g carbs!)
In the days before moto-cross, mountain bikes and 10-speeds, when I was 11, all I wanted was a 5 speed banana seat bike. Why a banana seat? They looked cool. They had that metallic shimmer. You could fit an STP and a Wynn's sticker on it and more than one butt. More kids than bikes? No problem. Sizable convoys of kids on bikes were a common sight, 'riding' each other, two and even three per bike, one on the back of the seat, one on the handlebars. I especially liked "riding" Loretta Dickerson, the only girl Dickerson kid, with four brothers. She was the first tomboy I'd ever known, and she taught me the term. "I'm a girl but I'm a tomboy so I don't wear dresses." Her name was pronounced "The Retta."
2 Executive Summary
Here he is opening the pocket.
I need a bib over here!
Jeremiah 20:12 Yet, O LORD of hosts, Thou who dost test the righteous, Who seest the mind and the heart;
Green Day were polarizing. From the beginning the knock against them was their lack of punk boanfides; no breakneck tempos, no yelled vocals and the lyrics were not only comprehensible but they were clearly about...girls. But Lawrence Livermore and his Lookout Records label (more HERE) stood by the band, as did a lot of record buyers. When the band signed to a major label, the same people who'd derided them as being 'too pop' now called them 'Greed Day'. It's no wonder they abandoned the punk underground. What's more interesting is how much they carried the punk flag, coming around to an anti-establishment view not so far removed from that of the punk politicos they'd left behind.
This was reinforced by a visiting Chicago religion scholar who is studying the dances from a strictly scholarly standpoint. As a non-Newar non-initiate, he also has not seen the dances in the actual temples, but from his interviews with completely different sources than my own, had gathered much the same thing.
FG=1.014@66F
We had pleasant conversations and much laughter. My cup runneth
I hadn’t thought of the decals since the week after I picked them up from the sign place. Bruce has been cleaning the garage because it’s been too rainy to work outside. “Where’s the boat name?” he asked me yesterday.
Texas is beautiful and I am more than grateful for this chance in our lives and a new beginning but it is so different from home. There are no flowers, no blooming trees, and their mountains are more like ant hills than mountains and they are brown and dead. Not beautiful with lakes and streams.
The goal here was to have a mix of well-known canon films and obscurities or at the very least films that may not be universally known amongst film buffs.
Mr Snow (to Cutler): “I was planning just to take the world. I didn’t realise I need you to give it to me.”
I closely followed the story of Tyler Clementi’s suicide and Dharun Ravi’s trial–in part because I couldn’t tell right from wrong. I couldn’t place blame enough for me to find closure and move on.
Hopefully it will cheer us all up with all the miserable rain and wind we have had lately.
Palin, who criticizes every single thing the President does, told Fox News that she found it “odd” that the card emphasizes the dog instead of traditions like “family, faith and freedom.” She also said that Americans are able to appreciate “American foundational values illustrated and displayed on Christmas cards and on a Christmas tree.”
Ashar: Don't you get it? I spent sleepless nights imagining you and Khizar in each other's arms. It killed me...It made me cruel, cold, loveless...I wanted to kill you and be hanged for it..I fantasized about it, but business kept me busy....That and dissing Sara.
» 9/30 – Boston, MA @ TD Garden
I’ve never been so happy I got my long run out of the way mid-week.
Back to last night. So, Laura sits down, and we start chatting. She's 26, the same age as my son, and nice as can be. Her mom is there too. They drove down from the upper peninsula of Michigan thru Chicago (to pick up mom) and over the Cedar Falls. Very cool people. She mentioned my "past" and that was fine - I actually appreciated that. It's not a secret.
Mitte (City Centre) was gaunt and bleak in those days. High walls of grimed brick and sandstone; apparently empty streets and the feeling that somebody was watching you. I'm sure they were. In reaction, we started to sing 'On Ilkley Moor Bart'at' and skipping across the Alexanderplatz. Maybe there's some film of that still extant in a Stasi archive. I had the worst meal I've ever had in my life (including school dinners) in the café underneath the Television Tower. The only people you saw were scuttling along in a dreadful hurry, if they weren't queueing outside shops with merchandise scattered sparsely along the shelves. It was hard to find anything to spend our Ost-marks on.
Paul says in verse 18 that he even considered that sufferings weren’t even worthwhile to complain about when compared to what we would experience in Heaven.
Construction began on the Coborn Plaza Apartments last fall and was finished this summer before students arrived at SCSU.
But this may be one of the most positive developments to come out of Amy Chua entering my life: that doubt is shrinking ever smaller as I see what that other life looks like. It will not ever go away completely, but every time I read something more about Tiger mothers, I become more and more comfortable with the idea that for Polly and Pip – not to mention me and Ava - the Rutgers solution is not a bad way to go.
23. hugs are for wusses, give me a kiss! +
STORY: Jason Bourne isn’t the only assassin to come out of Redstone and this is the story of one of them, whose life is directly affected by Bourne’s exploits in the first three films.
of the 20th century. She was
Austin still mentions you by name.
Caesar translation for the quiz: One way remained through the Sequani, by which they were not able to go on account of the narrow passes if the Sequani were unwilling. When they were not able to persuade them on their own account, they sent representitives to Dumnorix of the Haedui, in order that they get an agreement from the Sequani withn him as a g0-between. Dumnorix, because of his popularity and generosity among the Sequani, had great authority and was on good terms with the Helvetii, because he had married the daughter of Orgetorix from that tribe, and, influced by a desire for power, was eager for revolution and wished to keep under obligation for his own benefit as many tribes as possible.
No. In some ways, his Hadley (now, that’s a name for an Aaron Sorkin show) — a sarcastic, white-shirted, merman-obsessed functionary — is just a refracted version of Josh Lyman. He talks fast, makes time for some laughs, but is a professional above all. It’s quite possible that his character is the film’s most entertaining. (“Ugh, these zombies. Remember when you could just throw a girl in a fucking volcano?”)
I wasn't reading carefully enough at first, and thought it was an allusion to the wizard. I was a bit surprised because it didn't fit in with the context of the story. Then I read it again and realized it was just a name coincidence.
Kid#3 I bet Joe’s not going to want to do my movie anymore.
Robert: "If we do 'The Battle of Evermore' on the tour, we need someone to sing Sandy's part."
She speeds up
My oppressor.
I love being a mum. There is nothing like those delicious little kisses and cuddles each day. I actually enjoy making school lunches and helping out with reading. I love play dates and visits to the park. My beautiful boys are the reason I get up each morning and my last thought each night. We had such a lovely Mother's Day last weekend. The older boys had made some careful purchases at the school Mother's Day stall and they were so excited to give them to me on Sunday morning. Jack was of course oblivious to the proceedings but he like sharing the chocolate and the fun. Then it was time to head to the local playground with Grandad for a BBQ and a relaxing afternoon. It was just a lovely day, very relaxing and the perfect way to celebrate being a mum.
AT&T Spotlight Performance: Steelo Vasquez – a street dancer who suffered a brain aneurysm that left him unable to walk or talk. His performance tonight is his first public performance since he was hospitalized. Such an amazing story, it brought a lot of people in the audience to tears, including me.
Some claim that tax increases on high-income people — in particular, increases in capital gains and dividend tax rates — depress private saving rates and investment. But as Professor Joel Slemrod has written, “there is no evidence that links aggregate economic performance to capital gains tax rates.”[3] Similarly, the Congressional Research Service (CRS) has reported that most economists find that reducing capital gains tax rates would have only a small — and possibly negative — impact on saving and investment. [4] Although tax increases on high-income individuals might reduce their saving, if the revenue generated is devoted to deficit reduction, the resulting increase in public saving is likely to more than offset any reduction in private saving. CRS concludes, “Capital gains tax rate increases appear to increase public saving and may have little or no effect on private saving. Consequently, capital gains tax increases likely have a positive overall impact on national saving and investment.” [5]
I didn’t see any movies this weekend. How about you? Do you already have spring/summer vacation plans? Tell me about it.
I asked Weinman if he was going to file the en banc motion.
$1.00 off Next Issue of COOKING LIGHT Magazine
you lead me into love
Report
It has been so long since I have updated my blog that I hardly know where to start. First I hope you all had a wonderful Christmas season with the ones you love and secondly my best wishes to you all for the new year. It would be difficult to go over all the events and emotions of the last months so I will start where I am now.
The Whimsy Stamps DT and Special Guests have been previewing these beautiful stamps for the past 2 days, and today we are celebrating their release with a BLOG HOP!
I met up with Gail who was talking to one of the sellers and I showed her the photo, as I thought she might say that she is a well known make-up artist or something. She didn't know either. The guy who Gail was talking to had a look and thought that she might be off a TV series called The Only Way Is Essex. A drama serial about this group of friends who live in the south east.
1 T fish sauce
Album: Go
1 stamp set - 3x4 Paper Smooches - Cut Loose (not shown)
I matched her up with BasicGrey Urban Prairie papers and Doodlebug ribbon - perfect matches with this image! I also used the CC Cutters Curly-Q die (which you can buy in the store now here) and the new Bees Knees Logos set. I love this new illustrator for All That Scraps! She was such a pleasure to colour in, here's a close up...
Beware: Spoilers ahead (if Internet accounts are to be believed; I won’t see the movie until Friday). I’ll give you a countdown to the spoilers, though.
Just keeping it real people! Just keeping it real......
Dear K-1 Teachers,
Once again I encourage you to take the time to look at all these verses.
8:30am: dressed and ready for a bike ride on our roads bikes. Only decision was whether we go for 45 mins or 1 hr. We opted for 1 hour because we decided that we would ride our hybrid bikes to our 11:30am massage on the beach!
Amidst all the anxiety and pathos swirling around inside my head, these two records were released. Prince’s new single, “Sign “☮” the Times”, came out in February (the album of the same name wouldn’t hit the shops until the end of March); The Joshua Tree came out in March, one week before my birthday.newThe sound of “Sign “☮” the Times” enthralled me, what with its sparse arrangement—but its topical lyrics and existentialist bent resonated. The line “some say man ain’t happy unless man truly dies” (and its variant, “some say man ain’t happy truly until man truly dies”) especially fit right in with all the pondering I’d been doing about the nature of existence.
Keep in mind, this isn't until April, but if you're interested polish up those novels! Personally, I've been having trouble finding someone that actually wants epic fantasy, so this had me jumping out of my chair!
In 1953, a man named Malchiel Gruenwald (a member of the Mizrachi party) accused Kasztner of collaboration and war profiteering. What originally started out as a libel suit (levied by Kasztner’s lawyer against Gruenwald) turned into a year and a half trial where Kasztner’s war-time actions were put on trial. His actions and the repercussions of it became a huge debate in Israeli society, which continues until this day.
Some have postulated on the necessities of childbearing, parenthood, marriage, and many other things seemingly necessary to fully experiencing mortality, but all these are extras. They may be enjoyable, growth inducing extras, but they are extras all the same. Why some of us need these extras is known to our Heavenly Parents, and we have to trust in their wisdom and timing. I put these all into extras because all of these do not happen for many of God’s children. Those of us in mortality do have growth and learning to do in this life, and we should not speculate on why some of us are given some experiences that others are not, but we can trust that the learning and experience we have in this life are intended for our growth, no matter if they are hard, joyful, scarring, or easy.
“He may not be right, but he’s the boss,” the voice said. “You take him out, Carl. The boss didn’t tell me to do him.”
I really don’t want to. I wanted and thought we would do this together as friends, as we have discussed this before and she was in agreement it would be for the best to live together, until one of us needs to move on after I go full time.
The news media and civil rights groups had fought unsuccessfully to get the ruling party, the African National Congress, to include an exception in the law that would allow for the revelation of classified information if it were in the public interest.
by Hilary Robertshaw
(I’m just teasing him a little, although I think that might be not totally inaccurate. But I do know that sometimes he’s happy with his time despite his placement, and sometimes he’s not so pleased with his time despite placing well.)
On a slightly related note (ie, shopping), I now am looking for the last few bits for our pad... The carpets should be going down soon, so with a few accessories, we'll be done! What we really need, aside from a wardrobe, is a coat rack. We've got a personalised peg each, but our guests have nowhere to hang their garb. Have you seen anything suitably vintage and coat-hangy, dear readers?
Some girls just dream of having that perfect fairytale wedding, and when the time finally comes to make it a reality, they are suddenly scrambling to find the ideal favors and decor to bring it all to life. Whatever you envision for your magical event, fairytale wedding favor ideas that match your reception theme can really enhance the look and feel of your event—and we have them for you.
I’m excited for Micah’s baseball team. They started their tournament in the very lower part of the standings listing, yet they are now doing very well in the tournament. They have won their first two games. They have two games to go – one tomorrow afternoon against the #1 seeded team (Yikes!) and then one more after that, either for the championship or for third place, depending on the result of tomorrow’s game. Go Raptors!
If you’re in your third trimester now and you start to experience that “I can’t be bothered” voice inside your head, what I’d suggest you do is try and remember how great you feel AFTER you’ve been to your exercise class or done a workout, and focus on that feeling, as it may just motivate you to pop your trainers or reach for your swimsuit and head out the door to your exercise class, or to the pool.
Vinnie Colaiuta (Drums), Gerry Etkins (Keyboards), Steve Forman (Percussion)
Then God led our hearts to long even stronger than before to return home. We needed a few things to fall in line for that to happen and most importantly Matt would need a job. One by one those little details began to change and fall in line. Now all Matt needed was a job.
So what's the motive for this flimsy confection of "cuh, can't say anything any more" bollocks? Well, I can't say for sure. But it fits with the Mail's usual narrative about how we the good old white male British law-abiding are being persecuted in our own country by uppity minorities with a sense of grasping entitlement, who complain about everything and have the sympathy of the out-of-touch metropolitan homosexual elites that run everything from their ivory towers in Islington. A quick glance at the best-rated of the (360 and counting!) comments shows that it's working: To all the foreigners complaining about this programme and 'Come Fly with Me'. There is something you need to do before complaining if you don't like BRITISH humour, remember, it's our country, and we will laugh at whatever we want to. If you don't like it, PACK YOUR BAGS!
But what is being freshly pressed? Blogs that are freshly pressed are displayed on a special tab on the main page of wordpress.com! As you might expect, this brings a great increase in traffic, which in turn will greatly increasethe ammount if people who follow your blog if it is good, or increase the amount of apathy or even hatred you receive if your blog is bad. I have often thought that the worst sort of comment a blogger could ever receive would be a self styled Ignatius Riley replying to a post with a mere “Ho hum.”
Why am I telling you all of this?
And I do. But it turns out that the only thing the school manages to get even remotely organized is the video. Other than that - no junior high kids, no fun activities, no tours of the classrooms. The video isn't even up and running yet the entire time I'm there, and it takes me an hour and a half to get through all of the registration stations. The event itself runs for less than 3 hours, and the video is not playing after an hour and a half. Hmmmm. I'm hoping our experiences at the school once my son becomes an official Kindergartner aren't always this disappointing.
Who me? Yes, me. I had my ipod, my hair was in a ponytail, and I was appropriately dressed in my running shoes and capris! What's even weirder than being pegged as a runner was my mental response to his exhortation: "Yes, I am looking forward to it."
I've been off the blog scene for quite a bit. With working full time and preparing for that dear hubs of mine to leave for a long deployment, life got busy. For the months leading up to Paul's deployment, I wanted to dedicate every single second to my husband and living our life (and completing house projects!). The blog got kicked to the curb.
With a twinkle in my eye I told her of my time as the Editor of the Cotesbach Bell (ignoring my real journalistic pedigree), a newsheet dedicated to life in Cotesbach, a hamlet with a population of around 150.
Now that's not to say I don't research all this. I have a set of instructions in how to load and fire a flintlock, as well as a manual on surgeon's tools and what each do. I have (at last count) 187 pages in folders dedicated to the Regency era, Ranging from How to Address a Peer, to a Map of England (with street names and buildings) from 1813, to even a page concerning the weather events in England during that time.
‘World War Z’ is scheduled to hit theaters on, you guessed it, 12/21/12. How apropos.
The index measures how easy and inexpensive it is to move goods through a country based on several criteria, including the quality of ports and rail, competence of transport companies, the ability to track goods, and prevalence of bribe solicitation. Singapore scored the top score of 4.13 out of 5. Hong Kong was just behind with 4.12. Japan was 8th overall with a score of 3.93, the same as the U.S.
I ran away today
I decided to head to Goodwill because I usually have good luck there. It was during one of their auctions so the store was pretty crowded, but people were congregating around the auctioneer. This meant that I had free reign of the rest of the store. I stumbled on some cowboy boots that I really wanted. I tried to squeeze my foot into them, but sadly, they didn’t fit. Which is pretty shocking because I wear a 6 or 6.5. No luck though, so I continued on to the home goods.
This recipe makes 12 regular size muffins. The key to the high dome on them is to fill the liners right to the top. My ice cream scoop did the trick. One scoop per liner and no batter was left over.
#65. football
Hachi: IPA?
20 oz green enchilada sauce
SOCIAL/EMOTIONAL:
What fun it is to see what kind of soup will be delivered to your door each week.
Please take the time to check out the results via the link above – it’s always interesting to see how we’ve done. This year we have featured in Division 2 for the mixed and Division 4 for the mens.
Last weekend I attended the wedding of one of my close friends. The Galway nuptials involved a prolific congregation and an ill-fated sense of preparation on my part. I was keen to perfect the art of capsule dressing and bring with me only that which would fit into an overnight case.
I think we all agree that the woman who is 'bien dans sa peau' is the woman that we would all like to be. Reading and re-reading all the thoughtful and heartfelt comments on this topic got me to thinking about the practical side of beauty. What simple steps can we take to enhance our beauty? How can we not only feel like a French girl but look like one too? I am not talking about miracles but small things that make us not only look better but feel better.
The designated sale day was yesterday. A friend of mine got up at 6:00 a.m. yesterday to travel to Liverpool to queue up. Joining the queue at 8:00, he stood in the hail and wind for over two hours but when he eventually reached the head of the queue only one ticket remained for the Friday night - he had hoped to buy three, hardly an excessive order.
The type A collector has an organized list of haves and needs ready to go at a moments notice. For many of us, that means we have a link to our want list(s) on our own blog - and perhaps a link to the stuff we have available for trade as well.
Does my sexiness upset you?
“Soon. Preparations are almost complete,” the source said when asked whether North Korea was planning to undertake a nuclear test.
She writes, "Hearing-impaired youngsters are concrete learners and often have difficulty with abstract concepts. We have to ease into such concepts."
Tomorrow is my 19th Wedding Anniversary. NINETEEN years... who knew!! Pretty soon, I will have been with my husband longer than I was single. It literally feels like just a few years...
So an appropriate venue was set, the USS Abraham Lincoln, and the aircraft carrier was moved about so that it had the correct backdrop and lighting. When everything was ready, the President flew out to the ship.
Right now, I feel a sweetness toward this woman.
That in particular victims of violent acts and their friends and relatives cannot manage understanding for the sanctions imposed is in my opinion quite understandable, cannot however alter the view that the education of the youthful perpetrator must be in the forefront of juvenile justice.
Absolutely gorgeous!
This morning's sun
Your other other neighbours stay the night when you have to leg it to hospital because of some problem or other and they get your eldest child up and dressed and take them for breakfast with their own kids and they have a food fight and think it’s the best thing ever.
Former prime minister Ahmad Abdullah Badawi tried to cancel the project when he followed Mahathir into office, but was unable to do so, part of the eternal enmity he earned from Mahathir, who worked tirelessly to drive him from office.
A decade ago, I took a walk with my colleagues in the forest with a nature guide from the Singapore Nature Society. The guide really gave us a lot of insight on the flora and fauna in the forest. I remembered him pointing out the various pitcher plant species. Did not notice them during my nature walk last month. Perhaps they were elsewhere.
Soggy tan pork chops are not tasty. Potato salad which has been diluted enough to run off one’s plate is not worth catching. When choosing paper plates, cheaper is not always better. And when the sky looks angry, one may need to pay attention.
...but what else is new?
Not that my days are very different, but my kids and hubby are
"Courage to let go of fears and insecurities, courage to take a leap of faith, courage to surrender to our destiny and ultimately courage to give into love and to life itself, despite the incredible uncertainty of the future.
A while ago this little questionaire went around on Facebook. I thought it would be fun to requiz the kids, now that they are all older. The old answers are in italics. The new ones follow.
This is a subject I love. I've always been an avid reader, am a published poet, and am working on several books I hope to one day publish. So, to say I have an appreciation for this subject is a bit of an understatement. Plus, this is one subject that neither kids dislikes too much. Yes, Jay has Dyslexia & Dea struggles with Writing. However, both make steady improvement in their weaker areas, which really aren't that weak anyway. Both kids are avid & strong readers, which also helps make this an enjoyable subject to cover.
viewed from afar
Moving parallel to the poker game plot is Bond’s developing relationship with Vesper, an agent from the Treasury who’s been assigned to the mission. She’s authorized $10 million to go into Bond’s account for the poker game buy-in and she can authorize $5 million more if she deems it a wise investment. Craig and Eva Green have fantastic chemistry. The dinner scene aboard a high-speed luxury train is one of the best back-and-forths in the franchise. There’s a mutual attraction between them but Lynd makes a point to tell Bond that this will be a business trip. After they pop-psychoanalyze each other, Lynd asks him, “How was your lamb?”
I am Lou, the new co-ordinator for the Stamp n Doodle Tutorial team, and to me falls the task of arranging and posting everything on the Learning Centre site. I will say that, as you may have noticed, I am English, and my spelling will reflect that, so don't think I cant spell!!
neglect and 'improvement' so it is difficult to appreciate it as it would have appeared to visitors, to pilgrims in its earler centuries of existence.
To preserve my self-respect as much as to show Ron I could do it, I had to find a way to use my writing skills to bring in more respectable money.
And that’s the problem. It’s become a cliché. We assume it’s true, because it’s been around so long.
Times like these also open up new doors to new opportunities and relationships….
3. Tracking facility for freight trains running and Parcels status by customers
- “The men don't know; but the little girls understand.”
If you're a fan of Laughing Cow cheese, you probably have one of these boxes in your refrigerator right now. I usually eat a cheese wedge as part of lunch and before I'd toss each box away, I'd stare at it for a while...just knowing that I could do something crafty with it.
Garlic (optional), 1 table spoon
The animals are cut from Create a critter at 4 1/2
I can't help but wonder if he is breaking some of her ribs, carrying her that way. I wanted to know more about this interesting woman, who went right back into the fray even though she had spent most of a year jailed for her activism. I know that I am not that brave. Wikipedia has a very long article about her, beginning with this:
Unfortunately I was living in a dream world. The lump never went away and neither did the headaches. I guess I have put it off long enough. Part of me felt anxious about making the appointment and part of me felt really stupid. Anxious because I felt like "IF" it is serious I am just about to open a whole can of worms, not just for myself but for my family as well. Stupid because the thought of saying "Hi I need to see a doctor because I have a lump on my head" just seemed a bit humorous. I was just sure that the lady on the other end would bust out laughing, put me on hold, and tell everyone with in an ear shot that she had a hypochondriac on line 1. Her reaction was quite the opposite, rarely do you get seen same or next day at a military clinic but in this case I was able to be seen the next day!
- Saint Chinian
lest ye be judged.
God is a BIG God! How many times have we sang songs about it…and yet sometimes we put Him in a box and think surely He could not work in a particular situation. All the time thinking that we have a better solution as to setting up the “atmosphere” where God can do HIS work better.
So, what if God decides to put an inkling of good in the hearts of people who have so far rejected him, just like he did for you before you were saved? Isn’t the basis for prevenient grace the idea that we don’t even have the ability in our fallen state to reach out to God, so the Spirit graciously gives it to us to make salvation possible? Christian, if he put the potential to recognize Light in you, don’t you think he can do it for someone else, even if they don’t identify it as being from God? Here’s what the Apostle Paul has to say:
And loose obedience to a vegetable law
Lone Star Signatures Autograph cards
I forgive myself that I haven’t accepted and allowed myself to see that the whole day I was rushing myself by doing task as fast as possible not giving myself a moment to be with myself and I came at the same speed here to write
My card for this week uses this adorable Gorjuss Girl image from Funky Kits which I have had for an age and not used enough!! I love these stamps which are such fun to colour and are perfect for all ages.
58) I am built for gymnastics and not ballet. I wish I was built for ballet. I can do ballet, but not gymnastics. I am not limber.
07. Burn Notice (prod. by Anno Domini)
I have always seen these reviews as much for the companies themselves to see their services highlighted and compared in one area, as well as being a resource guide and benefit for authors looking at the business of subsidy and self-publishing. I say business, because that is exactly what it is. These companies are primarily supposed to be supplying author services for a fee, and secondly, ‘adopting’ the role of publisher. For some, this ‘adopted’ role is borrowed far more loosely than others, rendering services which vary from excellent and reputable to out and out scam merchants preying on unsuspecting authors. For the authors using these companies, it is also a business. They are paying out three to four figure sums of money to companies—even with the best intentions and print quality offered in the world—they are not traditional publishers and most of them operate with a business model lacking a hard and fast distribution plan to high street stores and personnel without true publishing experience.
Small dessert
To all the students in my Creative Writing classes, many of which I consider friends now. Especially Pat Flewwelling, my constant supporter.
So we were doing an inventory last night of all the furniture boxes we'll need - ek please tell me why we are moving with a new baby?
We have multiplied our possessions, but reduced our values. We talk too much, love too seldom, and hate too often.
Where: Nino's Bar (Findlay)
Tactics as a team member: Following the tank and their path of destruction isn’t such a bad thing to do. Most bad guys will be focusing on bringing it down, letting you get some easy kills and taking care of the exposed would-be hijackers. A team like this supporting the tank is a powerful force.
1/3 c white beans (cannellini beans), drained and rinsed (1 can will make 3 salads)
We'll be updating this post throughout the day to create an archive of all the posts. We'll also try to post links to every blog using the Twitter stream @BADDtweets
Dear Taxpayer ,
1989--Clem Snide
At NHV, we hope we’re not just creating a great place to taste wine. We certainly want to do that, but we also want to change the world … or at least our little corner of it one random act of kindness at a time. Please help us make that happen.
Oh, and by the way, you will find that the word "won" is spelt "won" rather than "w" "o" "n".
Sing me back home with a song I used to hear
Dave Cooke had the initial idea to take a vehicle of aid to Romania after the pictures of the orphanages were shown on the TV in 1990. His friends rolled their sleeves up and appealed for aid and it all came flooding in thanks to appeal on local radio. Dave's sister, Jan, however thought that it would be a great idea for her own children - Alex & Peter (all grown up now!) to put presents into a box - rather than the donations going into a big anonymous pile. Thus the shoebox idea was born. She told co-founder Dai Hughes who being 'media savvy' could see what a great idea it was and encouraged the first collection of shoeboxes.
by lips, and lips grow afraid,
The Energies of May
1. A profile of each diocese, providing information about characteristics of the
(P.S. I’m getting the pictures off google because I don’t make it a habit to take pictures of the pies I’ve made. I’ll source them at the bottom, though.)
Some come as Nicodemus and leave as Nicodemus.
If nothing else, I am clean and smell good, and if, god forbid, if someone happens to drop by unannounced, I won’t scare them away. But it’s more than that. When I was young, lazing about in sweatpants was the supreme act of comfort. Now that I am old(er), it’s just the opposite. The comfort now comes from taking care of myself, showing my best self to the world, even when things feel like they’re falling apart. Somehow that single act of taking a shower becomes one of hope, of optimism.
Nine women with nine different points of view. Some very careful. Some (me) not so careful. All of them wonderful to look at in the end.
I got it easy though. I’m not a smoker nor a drinker.
I didn't. And I'm an expert.
But hold those thoughts for my next and last installment.
There will be times where we feel lonely, or isolated, or like no understands us. We feel disconnected because we don’t feel like we ever truly “fit in” with the people around us, or ever “fit in” with this world. But that is exactly what this verse is telling us, that God has called us to be different, and for a greater purpose that we can see or fathom. We are not of this world. So why would we truly expect to (or even want to) “fit in” or be like every one else? Jesus never fit in. He was the biggest misfit of them all. No one still “in the world” could understand him, and he was PERFECT! Why would we expect to be treated any differently?
Now don’t you agree…..Don’t you think Stamper’s are just the best people? I do!!!! Seems Diane and I have a lot in common and now we are friends….all through this wonderful art called Stamping….especially with Stampin’ Up! what else!!
This is the perfect way to change up that usual tofu scramble. It makes a wonderful brunch but this meal would also make a delicious dinner served buffet style so everyone could pick and choose their own ingredients to make their perfect plate.
On a more personal note, I think I can let you know how relieved I am to finally know that I will be leaving Singapore for good (main reason is to be with my other half), but they have not decide when I should leave, either November or December. Duhhh, I can't wait to receive the official letter soon! And therefore I am still busy settling things here in Singapore and managed to complete a quick layout this morning before I go to work. Not quite like the whole design but I guess I just need to update my blog. lol. This layout is made for Bird is the Word {Together} challenge.
Next, the author's use of the same points from chapter to chapter is a bore. It seems that she feels like the reader didn't catch her point in the first example so she needs to repeat it again. For example, on three occasions she mentions how children scan the audience at their school and church programs looking for their parents to ensure they are watching. Three different times. In three separate chapters. A bit redundant. Many points, like this, are brought up again and again throughout the book.
For many reasons, finishing this room was much more satisfactory than completing the previous one. We were so burned out the first time that I think all we could manage when we'd finally hammered the lids back on our paint cans was to close the door behind us, mumbling obscenities as we trudged away. I don't think I even bothered to take the "after" shot to post next to the "before." Don't get me wrong -- we were happy that the room was no longer an eyesore, but it was a guest bedroom that we weren't going to use on a daily basis. It was a lot of effort for not a lot of immediate return.
98. You know what I think? I think that it is about time you stop ignoring me. Let’s say we engage in a meaningless conversation… +
The designer also defended his previous comments that women who cannot walk in his shoes, shouldn’t wear them and that wearing high heels is both pleasure and pain.
Whoa!
Llewelyn is a satisfyingly stolid everyman, full of awe and indignation. He is an excellent contrast to the peculiar and mysterious Barker about whom we only discover fragments as the narrative unfolds. There is enough edge to both characters, however, to promise conflict and crises in future instalments.
Surprise!: WR, Stephen Hill
Then there was Rose. Well that was unexpected! The surprise was completely ruined by a friend who texted me after the program aired (but while I was hastening back home to watch it on video) going ‘Woah, Rose!’. So wot’s going on there then? The web forums are no doubt bursting with theories, all of which I am refusing to read. All I know is that while I get frustrated by some of RTD’s plot resolutions I do trust and admire what he does with the series overall, and especially with the characters. Let’s wait and see. Let’s have no idea whatsoever and be so stunned that we have to spend ages going on about it. Hooray!
In reality, my children are relatively lovely people. I was using them to hide from the world, living through them so I didn’t have to make a life for myself and risk failure. This is why I’m so discombobulated.
1 begins
I know that I will want the blossoms to be most important, so the leaves around the blossoms should be the most interesting and the leaves away from the blossoms should fall away into the shadows. I will plan accordingly and have my brightest areas pull your eyes back into the blossoms, while background colors will have less contrast and have less YG03, more of the G28.
In that sense, transition is a second adolescence. It’s a second puberty, obviously, as you get your hormones on, but it moves you back to–it moved me back to, at any rate–a Zero Place, where I could reset all my counters and go through the defaults again, especially as regards my place in society. Do you really want this, or this? Do you want to be with men, or with women? Do you want a penis, or a vagina? Lots of people want to keep their penis. Let’s face it, we all (people not just trannie people) like to play with ourselves now and again. What naughty bits do you want to have? You can have whatever you want. Sort of.
I'm going to stick my neck out here and ask the most basic and probably dumbest of all questions: Why were they called the Semi-Dual stories?
I realize that I've reviewed this one before, but I have a few new comments to add. For one thing, I think I should announce that Ginger's "ingenue" voice doesn't drive me quite as nuts as it used to. And for another, while her performance is delightful and does improve with each viewing, Cornel's performance (the more subtle of the two) is the one that really improves. Each time I see It Had to be You, I'm more and more impressed with his talent for farce. The next time you see this movie, be sure to watch his face, even when another character is talking. Have you ever seen anyone having so much fun with a role? This being one of my very favorite movies, of course I recommend it to anyone who enjoys a good comedy for what it is: comedy.
However, as I said, life is changing. Despite doing a good job professionally, it seems likely that I may well be made redundant soon. At the same time as I am told this, I am preparing for a handfasting rite at Stonehenge. I am honoured to have been asked to act as a Trustee of The Druid Network (an organisation I have worked with since its inception). Priorities are changing. What will I have to give up as a result? What do I really need? What can I afford, and what nourishes my family?
The bill has already been passed by the Senate so House approval would complete legislative action and send it to Gov. Jan Brewer.
Born in the barbarians lands beyond Watford, it's fairly obvious to me that there is SOMETHING VERY WRONG about Jon, and it's not just his haircut. Being brought up by a den of badgers hasn't helped his social skills, or eating habits, but there's something spooky about him, and more than a little macabre about his writing.
So this lady probably could have been somewhere in her fifties but she had an incredible body, youthful glow, young spirit and I just thought... that's the yoga. I hope and pray that when I reach that point in life I'm as healthy and happy and rock solid as this lady. The other thing that made class unique was it was a small class and all women. Five of us. Always a cool dynamic. She had us all use the middle row and it just created a very cool energy in the room. I could feel us all feeding off each others’ strength and it was a very powerful class. When I was weak, wobbly, and short of breath, the girl next to me was kicking ass and it would cause me to dig down for some deep inner strength and know that I CAN DO IT TOO. And when someone else was The Wobbler, I was strong, controlled, poised, and could share just enough of that energy to hold myself up and maybe encourage someone else
Side A -
I have a dog
Right now, "My One and Only" is the song that's breaking me while I'm driving around town. "I dare you to let me be..your one and only." Daaaayyyyammm!! How do you come up with those words and then roar them perfectly, showing vulnerability and strength in one chorus.
I LOVE all of Robyn's Punnylicious line. They're so fun! The occasion that I chose to scrapbook for today isn't exactly a wonderful memory, but an endearing one, and something that should be documented nonetheless. My son broke his arm last weekend on the play set in our backyard, poor kid! Later while we were sitting snuggling he told me that he was trying to be Indiana Jones. He had flicked his whip up over the top of the play set, thinking that it would wind around something so he could pull himself up. It didn't quite work that way, poor little guy. I couldn't help but smile when he told me. I don't love that he got hurt, but I do love his very vivid imagination. He's such a character and I wouldn't have him any other way.
My craft room is a HUGE MESS! It is approximately 12' x 12' and has a small closet. I know I am lucky, I appreciate that, but somehow this room stays messy. I work, work, work, but never put anything away. So here's my plan:
I think it’s great that the girls want to wear their “Homes for the Troops” shirts, as did the school principal, but this also wasn’t the first time the girls had worn clothing that violated the dress code and, based on the ages of the girls, any “punishment” and/or embarrassment should fall squarely on the shoulders of the parents…and shame on them for trying to take a dress code issue and cause a big controversy for the school.
Alex was very happy with the ultra pleasant Nikita!
Show You the Way to Love
The illustration is 81/2 by 11 and will appear on 11 by 17 posters that will be hung around town. It is exhilarating to think my little illustration will be seen around town in New York :) LaNette really liked it and we agreed that it was by the grace of God that it was completed on time. Praise to the Ultimate Creator!
“I know that,” Mister Rogers said, “and that’s why the prayer I’m going to teach you has only three words.”
Hopefully the picture says it all, but it’s really good. I did make one mistake – I didn’t pay enough attention to the bread, and that is the thing that carries it after all. Über importante.
Well, guess who else would also love to play Christian Grey? That’s right, True Blood actor Alexander Skarsgard.
Helen Hamilton has spent her entire 16 years trying to hide how different she is--no easy task on an island as small and sheltered as Nantucket. And it's getting harder. Nightmares of a desperate desert journey have Helen waking parched, only to find her sheets damaged by dirt and dust. At school she's haunted by hallucinations of three women weeping tears of blood... and when Helen first crosses paths with Lucas Delos, she has no way of knowing they're destined to play the leading roles in a tragedy the Fates insist on repeating thoughout history.
The challenge was to make a card with the following: something blue, something round and at least 3 layers or patterns of paper. I think this fits the bill...
The bride receives henna and there are lots of performances at the sangeet the day before the ceremony.
The painting below, Ad Parnassum (1932) is considered Klee's masterpiece and the best example of his pointillist style. I love it, it reminds me of a fine mosaic.
You will produce a blanket with a vertical stripe down the center. I know, I am a rebel!
I obtained the effect for this picture by turning off the flash and keeping the camera as still as possible while the aperture remained open for a few seconds to compensate for the low light.
"I love this stuff . . . I need this . . .this is so good for my brain . . . I want more!"
The mushroom soup recipe is pretty simple when using canned cream of mushroom soup. I follow the can instructions then add real chopped mushrooms, butter to taste, and pepper to taste. Cook until warm and mushrooms are soft.
It took me two years of wiring & crying to get a sound to come out of the new (old) thing; another year before we finished the first record: thOUGH the LIGHT seem SMALL ... patience—yes—I am beginning to understand ... ALL during that time I was writing the songs—my impatience being slowly peeled off of me like an old skin ... no more use for it ... impatience ...
A single guy coping with a baby – and the picture you get of Drew at the starts bodes no good. As you get to know him, his mother dying so young, being in foster homes, makes you expect him to be a waster – he is of sorts but is also a painter. His coping with his son Nick, is so well depicted, I was there as he tries to even feed the baby, and cope with the sleepless nights. I did half expect Nick’s mother to try to reclaim him but she didn’t and such an obvious device would have spoilt the book.
Friend, I don’t know what you are facing today but the decisions you make will have an effect on your descendants and the world around them long after you are gone.
In the world of technology, it seems that everyone has gotten caught up in the whirlwind that is the spec race. Everything from quad-core processors to full servings of RAM – even full HD screens…on a smartphone(!) – its happening all around us. However, the phones with the top specs don’t always claim the throne of best-seller. But why is that? Naturally, variables such as software, ecosystems, and possibly even brand loyalty play critical roles in a consumers purchase decision. But I think there’s also another factor, one that isn’t mentioned very often: the name.
Add food writer John Thorne's books to this elite list. I was first made aware of his work many years ago by my bibliophilic friend Myra, who asked me to keep an eye out for Thorne's books. After at least a decade, I had yet to find any such titles in my shop or out book hunting, until one day when I was on a holiday in Great Barrington, Massachusetts at Yellow House Books, and spied a copy of Outlaw Cook (NY: Farrar, Straus, Giroux: 1992), a collection of food essays written with his wife Matt Lewis Thorne. I snapped it up and devoured it with great pleasure over the next several weeks and am waiting to savor another of his books, Mouth Wide Open, which is at the top of my bedside room reading pile.
I've been thinking about this a lot lately, largely because I look around me and I see us as a nation changing very rapidly. It's astonishingly breathtaking really. There is so much that is going on right now in our country and in our world that has the potential to fundamentally alter the core of the way we, and the generations to follow us, live, it'd be scary if it wasn't so fucking exciting.
Bachmann: I also hate gay people even more
Hi friends! Can you believe that February is coming to an end? Wow. I have quite a few bulbs planted that have started to come up and I'm actually quite ready for March to tell you the truth!
But those are the actions of kids at a high school, probably some of the same kids who bullied and tormented the gay kid for having come out publicly. As cruel as their behavior might be, it pales in comparison to the actions of a local school board member who was offended by the yearbook article.
Yet as we learn more from the Word our relationship with the Lord will grow increasingly more intimate because He chooses to reveal Himself to those who seek Him and obey His instructions. When you see that God always keeps His promises, your confidence in His faithfulness will soar. No matter what the situation, you’ll know you can trust Him. Then He’ll transform your worries into joyful anticipation about what He’s going to do next in your life. Even in the hard times, you’ll be convinced that the Lord will work them out for good.
"Eye for an Eye"
I had picked out a couple pairs of Steve Madden heals that were in really great condition, but I had zero information about the shoe, style or even what size they were... so I decided to cut my losses.
R - Well, I’m clearly Stan Laurel.
One of my favorite things about the movie were the dwarfs, and I kind of wish they had gotten more screen time. The dwarfs here aren’t miners but bandits who go around looting travelers on stilts that give them the appearance of giants. It was no doubt this clever visual gag that put me in mind of Terry Gilliam movies like “Time Bandits” and “The Brothers Grimm”. It is a bit of a surprise when they introduce themselves to Snow White and their names are not Doc, Grumpy, Happy, Sleepy, Bashful, Sneezy, and Dopey, but I had to remind myself that those names came from the Disney film and not the original tale. The dwarfs here provide a great deal of genuine comic relief, and it is a treat watching them take Snow White in and teaching her to fight and become a bandit herself.
Nothing is as
The shadow of the unmoving Sphinx,
a frying pan over medium heat. Add the pancetta and cook for 2-3 minutes until starting to crisp. Add the garlic, zucchini and lemon zest, then cook for another 2 minutes. Season and cool slightly. Then place in a food processor with the peas and pulse to a coarse paste.
I may be revising my ideas on parenting, at the moment.
Despite a dry September, the autumn color has been beautiful around the farm this year, thanks, in part, to an unusually wet August; you can see some of it here.
2. Do you believe that racial preferences cast doubt upon the qualifications of minorities who would have excelled without the extra boost?
Moon Knight #11
The third response came from a friend who is a writer, who's read the latest draft. By the standards of the other responses I've had, it has been catastrophic. She found my characters flat, my environments blank and the amount of dialogue overwhelming. It's almost impossible for me to believe she read the same book as my first two readers, particularly given that the main focus of the changes over the last two drafts has been breaking up the dialogue and adding detail to the environments.
Why? Because OG has discovered my Schoolhouse Rock CD (the "Multiplication Rock" one) that I used to use when I taught math. Also, coincidentally, my sister just gave us the DVD set, with all the videos.
8pm – Dessert & Aperitif
Happy Sailing!
2 tbls honey (can be replaced by apple puree)
This is similar to my relationship with power tools that have blades. I’ve seen them and used them enough to know that the smallest lack of carefulness could lead to serious harm, so, while also remembering that I’m kind of a clumsy guy, my sensitivities are heightened and I use these tools with great concentration. In using them more, as I become familiar with how they operate, I want to keep that wariness for my own safety and the safety of others. So it is with preaching.
While band were on hiatus during the 1990s, McLennan released four consistently strong solo albums, all of which I'd recommend unreservedly.
Using a bowl mix the cocoa with sugar, dark chocolate, cardamom and cinnamon.
Avocado is a good source of potassium. Its potassium content is three time that of a banana. Potassium is a mineral that helps regulate blood pressure. Adequate intake of potassium can help guard against circulatory diseases, like high blood pressure, heart disease, or stroke.
One day in Autumn 1915, the German writer Gustav Meyrink, the author of the famous work of fiction The Golem, was at home in his armchair, near the fire, a newspaper on his knees. He had just been reading the news from the Front and was reflecting on the profound causes of this world war in which Germany, France, Britain, Austria, Belgium, Italy, and now Serbia, Greece and Turkey, were involved, and which was going to cause the deaths of hundreds of thousands of people.
Living like you just begun.
IDF launches new track for outstanding programmers Is Israel better off with Romney in the White House? NYT on Israel, 1966 The Israeli Opera by Israel Obama’s got the UN’s back BDS Fail Of The Day: Park Slope Food Coop Votes Against Boycott Don’t call the Global March to Jerusalem anti-semitic!
Puff piece An uncritical story
created by Sheila Bentley/primdolly
This picture shows I Believe in Fairies on it's own. I have one coat on my pinky, two coats on my ring finger, three coats on my middle finger, and four coats on my index finger. No top coat. Please excuse the dry nastiness that are my cuticles.
- Physical/ Emotion/ Spiritual.
Nonetheless, this alliance is concerned about the public reaction in the aftermath of this event — as the early days in particular will be very sensitive.
I looked at QueryTracker's Success Stories from March 29, 2011 to March 28, 2012. During that one year period, 238 individuals reported an offer of representation. Of those, 54 provided an interview about their process. Out of those, 44 shared how many queries they sent.
22And pitying saints, whose statues learn to weep!
ONE STEP AT A TIME
For he has no one to help him up.”
How do you suppose the Republican vote on the Lilly Ledbetter Fair Pay Act stacked up in this light?
As usual, you can either follow the theme in its widest interpretation or you can ignore it : it's up to you. All you have to do is to post a post on or around Saturday 24 March 2012 and link it to the list below. Try and visit as many of the other participants as possible - and after all of that, you can go out for the day.
Source nndb.com
They warn that the government plans to force internet service providers to keep records of all browsing, email, gaming and chat use, and to make those records available to the authorities. It is now revealed the plan is to go further and allow real time snooping by the intelligence services. It will take place without a warrant, as most official surveillance already does.
The congregations of the waysides have always drawn me too: those outcasts and travellers, peddlers, hobbledehoys, lunatics and vagabonds who make their art in the ditches and say their truths to all who pass by. I've long felt this edge-territory home: I make camp behind the road signs, draw faces in the dust where the sparrows bathe, and I watch. And I wonder about them all travelling so fast past... Where are they going? Who are they travelling with? What would we talk about if they stopped for a pee?
Hi everyone! Happy Monday! I haven't been stamping and crafting lately but will do as soon as I finished organising my stuffs in my craft area. :)
The #Sessionbeerday Haiku Contest yielded a response dwarfed the #International Stout Day Haiku Contest, and simply blew away the drinkdrank Facebook Fan Page Photo Contest. The number of entries was simply staggering this go round. Okay, that last bit may have been a little over the top, but anyway, check out what came in:
The Global Fund for Women (GWF) which Since 1987 has awarded over $71 million to 3,800 women’s organizations in 167 countries. Their African program funds small grassroots women’s organizations working towards ending the practice of FGM.
The question, however, was where.
On my card I used the fabulous MARCI with TULIP and is available at the moment as a rubber stamp HERE. (Marci with Tulip digital stamp will be released soon.) I stamped it 3 times so I could put the extra tulips in the pots by the garden shed.
I grew weary
They were all saying over email that it was hard...Sorry girlies!
The Salter 1450 Scale is one of the best selling nutritional Salter scales on the market. But, as with any product, there are pros and cons. Come read this article to see a detailed list of the Salter 1450′s pros and cons.
Camping’s supporters had helped him in a multi-million-dollar advertising campaign, spreading his message of impending doom around the world. In the final weeks preceding the date, three thousand billboards bearing his message were erected in the US and a few other countries, a fleet of vehicles plastered with Judgment Day announcements criss-crossed the US, and believers all around the world passed out printed tracts with the message in public gathering places. Strangely enough, the purpose of all these messages was not to get people to “repent of their sins” and “accept Jesus as Savior,” so that they could escape from the Wrath that was coming. Camping and his followers accept a theology that says that God totally predestined, before their birth, all who were to be saved, and predestined the rest to be doomed. So the messages weren’t a “plea” to anyone … they were merely an announcement.
Robert, I want to be your next pointless, filandering, soon-to-be-forgotten mistake. I haven't had a man-crush this bad since Devon Sawa, so that's gotta count for something.
EastEnders: Tameka Empson (Kim Fox)
“… for I have learned to be content in whatever circumstances I am.” Philippians 4:11
i could tell sean was very relaxed because he kept asking if i wanted to go into shops the whole trip, not his usual cup of tea - very sweet!
We need to make clear that it’s not only Brizard’s style of leadership also known as ‘my way or the highway’ that needs to go but his entire agenda, which we as teachers and parents reject.
So of course I had to find a way to put some of my craftiness into showing him how much I appreciate and love everything that he has done in the last 7 years and the wonderful and sweet man that he is!
Toor dal- 1/4 cup
From wasted paper, stained with ink.
Think positive, Alicia!!!
While the official unemployment rate for 16-24 year olds may have crept up by 22 000 to 1.04 million or 22.2%, this includes over 300,000 students looking for work. Excluding those in full-time education however, there are still 17% of 18-24 year olds unemployed, up 2% from a year ago – with another 15% ‘economically inactive.’ The limited involvement of young people in the labour market as a whole is strikingly apparent – 44% of all 18-24 year olds are not working.
And this time I'm satisfied with the result, even though it's still not as pretty as the ones from the two bakeries I mentioned above
One such opportunity presented itself a few weeks ago when our good friend Tommy was visiting from San Francisco with his lovely girlfriend Liz. We threw them a little dinner party with some other mutual friends. The menu included Aperol cocktails, honey and thyme glazed ribs, a fava bean, cucumber and herb salad, and for dessert, this lemon cream tart - which was so thick and so deep, I'm just going to call it a pie.
Without the overshadowing perspective of faith, our dreams are simply aggravations. With it, our lives become the perfectly designed preparatory school for their ultimate fulfilment. Joseph wouldn’t have been ready to help rule Egypt and save his brothers…and ultimately the entire line of Jesus, if he had surrendered his dream to the circumstances of his life. Don’t you DARE give up on yours either.
The drink I made for the Fourth was gingerade. I partially peeled and cut into chunks a whole ginger root that had been in the freezer. It is easy to peel with a spoon when it starts to thaw, before it gets soft. Of course fresh might have been better, but this turned out GOOD. I boiled it in a medium pan of water for about 10-15 minutes, took out the root and added sugar to the water and stirred it well. Then I added it to cold water to make a gallon (with a spigot!) Make sure to pour the hot into the cold and not directly into a glass container. I reused the same root to make 2 more gallons, which I didn't sweeten, then sprinkled a little stevia in as I drank it. I carry it to work and in the car. I've cut way down on coffee and I'm drinking more liquids. You can reuse the root several times if you keep it refrigerated. It beats buying tons of flavored water!
We held the funeral in the New Year. Not that there was much left to cremate. The police were still looking for ‘Christos’, a strange, intense drifter. All of us had given the same account; how the guy stared at us all night, how only Liz hadn’t seemed to notice the haunted expression, the blank eyes. Seemed Christos was already an urban myth, moving between towns blatantly stalking his prey in full view of the night crowd before ripping their hearts out with his teeth in dark alleys or bedrooms. Cops up and down the country had been gathering descriptions of him and his methods for years, too many
To cut the cake, dip a sharp, thin knife (I find a boning knife works better than the serrated knife that the recipe calls for) in hot water and wipe dry. Holding the knife at approximately a 30 degree angle approximately 3/4" in from the edge of the cake, carefully and gently cut a cone-shaped section from the center of the cake, about 8" wide at the top and and 2" wide at the bottom (or "tip"). Think of it as the crater of a volcano. Wipe your knife clean. Place your hand flat on the top of the cone-shaped wedge and using the knife or an icing spatula, remove the wedge and invert it onto your hand. Place the cone-shaped wedge, flat side down, on a cardboard cake round or a plate lined with parchment paper and set it aside.
And yesterday, both of my orders came!
This competition is open internationally - with the proviso that the Book Depo delivers to your country. The competition will finish at midnight on Friday the 20th of April (which is when voting for the Queen of Teen Award is over). I will announce the winner right here on Tuesday 24th of April.
=$3.98 (plus fill cost) oop +tax
* Leave a comment on this blog post (+ 1 point)
The security questions appear to be directed at users who may have raised a red flag for one reason or another. Picking the questions themselves is a one-time task. But after you’ve chosen your three questions and answers, you may at some point have to remember and enter the answers to again verify your account.
Me (More voice. Kill me now.): "Get-um-good-ums!"
BS”D
Unabridged, 3 hr. 30 min.
“Santa Claus” by Throwing Muses (from, Just Can’t Get Enough: New Wave Xmas, 1996)
Finishes piano black center console and steering wheel
SH: You're not putting them back in the right order!
He then shook my hand.
I have had so many up's and down's being a Palace fan that I would never change that for any other team. It’s in my blood and it it will always be and whilst I feel sorry that I will not be taking my boy to a Palace game, just yet, I feel as though I saved him from many “wasted” weekends of not doing things as footy is on. In the last year I have spent so many weekends with my family that it has been really good and positive for us all. Whilst I have made a few games this year and I have missed the time with my dad, the group around us and with Palace. I still feel as though it was something I needed to do after 30 years of going, the last 20 years as a season ticket holder, and it was good.
Cancer patients have heightened needs for diets free of toxic chemicals and full of cancer-fighting nutrients. Diet and nutrition may improve both a cancer patient’s chances for recovery and the patient’s quality of life during treatment.
And what a better person to do it for than your own child!
My husband, Jim, says I’m addicted to purses. Admittedly, I like them, I just don’t know why because I have very little to carry in them.
Like, how last week, when I finished writing the post titled Standing, I ended with the words, “Tomorrow I will tell you the things that I found when I went back into my journals...” And even though almost a week has past. I haven’t.
Even as I write this, I’m sweating and starting to whimper, “Nooo, God, noooo, nooooo!” But that’s because of my own connotations with the word work. In my life, work is something I have to do. I drag my ass out of bed every morning and dutifully punch my timecard. I’m lucky in that some components of my work—graphic design—are things I’m passionate about, but let’s be honest. Some days work eats my soul.
For example, someone who has had more experiences with children seems to be better at intuitively knowing how to deal with them in certain situations.
crafts and me stamp - hannah lynn - bookworm fairy
It was clear even to a civilian like me we were all in deep trouble, SWAT team survivors desperately crawled to new positions and returned fire but the aliens began to move away from their ship and eliminate them when their location became known. They moved on their three legs with a curiously smooth motion making it clear that like humans they were apex predators of the highest order. My first thoughts about dying began to appear in my head figuring the aliens would eventually concentrate their fire on what small amount of weak protection we had left.
Last night was a self-choreography of tossing, turning, fitfulness. Like synchronized swimming in the bed.
Most cosmetic acupuncture practitioners agree that it is not just about the face; the body must be addressed as well. They believe that by addressing additional parts of the body as well, the body will be able to better support the benefits seen in the face.
We learn that one day, somewhere in the Cevennes, a group of Huguenots had gathered, and the preacher was already engaged in marrying four young couples when the dreaded French Dragoons appeared on the scene. Many of the Huguenots succeeded in escaping, but two of the bridal couples were apprehended. In the nearest town they were given the choice: “Become Roman Catholics or die at the stake!” but, undaunted, they refused to recant their Huguenot convictions.
And yes, The Man's iron will regarding accepting the cats has stood up just as well as you thought it would. He totally loves them. (HA. I win.)
Ephesians 4:2
So the cute little kitty is the newest animal dumped at our house. Someone put her in a box and left her in our driveway. She was very scared when Mom brought the box inside (thinking that it was one of Granddad's or Uncle Andrew's boxes) and opened it to find a tiny little fluffy kitten. She was a little bit skinny and scared of Lola and I.
Starring Marc Dacascos (otherwise known as the Chairman of Iron Chef: America), this 93 flick follows the basic storyline of troubled high school kids who get their lives turned around by a new teacher. Not the most original story, but whatever works, right? So who is the inspirational teacher? A capoeira (a little known Brazilian dance fighting style) practitioner. Seems like smooth sailing, but wait! The local gang also knows capoeira! Wow, what are the chances? Wooden acting, recycled story, but the fights are something you don’t get to se very often. This one is worth a look back.
But in real political substance and character both are parliamentary democracies.
I mean, I haven't done the research on her personal life (and maybe I should) but a LOT of her dialogue is extremely sarcastic. That's how she is. I am therefore ascribing to the belief that this isn't all entirely truthful.
I’ll get my coat…
We all need to be loved and to love someone. We all want to feel that we matter to someone and that someone matters to us. My wife’s ongoing affair and her desire to end our marriage has created a void. It’s one that I’m not sure can be filled by anything other than a loving and caring relationship with another woman.
My Psychedelic Monk surprised me when it didn't blow the top off the primary. It didn't even foam up into the blow-off tube that I had set up. I was thinking this might be a stuck fermentation, but I can peek inside through the airlock's hole and see that foam still covers the entire top of the beer. This one I may have to let sit up three to four weeks before transferring to carboy. Even there, I expect to wait 3-4 months before kegging. This has the potential to get to 13%.
My forensic reconstructions
Freedom is essential because their expertise exceeds yours, in their area. If you know more than everyone on your team, you have a weak team.
Hi Inkers! This week we have a ripper of a theme ... hehe pun intended.
Are you tired yet? Just imagine how tired the seamstress must be after sewing all of these!!!!!
We appeal to the authorities to do the right thing and arrest these traitorous Muslim fanatics. We are at war. Our men and women are being killed on a daily basis and we are expected to put up with this gross outrage and insult to the families of the fallen.
If you haven’t got a ha’penny
How do you encourage your kids to do their best without creating an environment of perfectionism?
When we pulled into our parking space we met an older gentleman who asked a few questions. He then asked me if I was from Ireland. Now one of the things that you need to understand at this point is that I like to think I am a pretty good mimic. All through the first week of the trip I had been kidding around with Sherri and the kids, speaking with an Irish brogue and just messing around. However I guess as we pulled up and I was talking with this older gentleman, I continued speaking with my brogue and he thought I was really Irish, not just an Irish Yank. He was telling me of his trip. He, his wife, his daughter, and grandchildren were taking the vacation of a lifetime for his 80th birthday. I couldn’t believe this spry gentleman who didn’t look a day over 65, was 80. They were on a trip from Youngstown Ohio and had spent a week in Scotland and then come to Ireland. I think he was happy to have another adult male to speak with and it’s why we spoke at such length.
82. I write this sitting in the kitchen sink. —Dodie Smith, I Capture the Castle (1948)
conceived in controversy, born of necessity, quietly insisting
The good you do today, will often be forgotten. Do good anyway.
@PeoplesAstro
“Dad?” The word dropped from her mouth to plink the floor.
Well I survived the surgery. I was really anxious because the only other time I was put to sleep caused a crazy reaction that landed me in the hospital for 9 days. But luckily this was nothing like that.
Elizabeth is awesome people. Like WAY funny and her posts are so entertaining, so though you'll be hearing from me today over on her blog, you should follow her anyway.
Superintendent Henry Budhram said the policeman, (Constable Hlanganani Nxumalo, pictured left) who is part Radebe's VIP protection unit, is expected to appear in the Camperdown Magistrates Court on Monday, where he faces 12 charges of attempted murder.
I couldn’t believe it when it opened up like normal to the Angry Birds game that Boy-Who-Asks-Questions was playing just before he was lifted out of the car that morning. To this day debate rages in my house about which ‘someone’ did that lifting, but regardless, it was one close call.
Rest in Peace and thanks for the music.
filled with great fervor and zeal
What I would like to see happen is to see The Rock win. Now, it’s just not because of how I feel about the individual performers but for story-line purposes. The Rock said this past Monday that he had to beat Cena to prove that he is the greatest superstar in the history of the WWE. He beat Stone Cold Steve Austin at WrestleMania. He beat Hulk Hogan at WrestleMania, and now he needed to beat John Cena at WrestleMania. Now then, doesn’t it seem like he left someone out?
Nope, this is not a fan post.
When in doubt, Analyse, as one of my good friends used to say to me. Not having a suitable Tektronix protocol analysers lying around the place (as he used to), I went looking for something a little more modest.
Gauge: 4 stitches per inch
I would like to enter this card into the following challenges:
the only squadron of the F-86s that we had could not operate as the runway of the only military airport Kurmi Tola had been rendered out of operation by the Indians bombing it incessantly.
The Lord bless our country have pity upon it in all its present afflicted condition.
But we are ahead of ourselves. We learn in a flashback that Dorothy is not really related to Henry and Em, she was left on the doorstep as an infant (played by the ugliest baby I’ve ever seen on celluloid). A note in the basket says to open the attached envelope when she turns 18—she is clearly the lost Queen of Oz. Bad guys from Oz come to steal the note before she reads it. (They leave Oz in a tri-plane; arrive in Kansas in a biplane. Must be like heaven, when you leave, you lose a pair of wings.)
roll and a spinach-soy cheese
Arise...arise....
Sent: Tuesday, March 27, 2012 10:11 AM
Do you remember that 1st day of school and the apprehension that came with lunch time? The fear of not having a seat at a table was a very real and very intense feeling.
The last stop was updating the title of our car at the DMV (I paid it off a few months ago, but put off getting a new title). When I got to the window, I stated my case and had a copy of my marriage license (showing my name change) and original purchase receipt for the mileage record. Again, the clerk was very pleasant and complemented my preparedness, something I ‘m pretty sure amounts to a soldier’s medal of honor on the battle field. There was only one moment of awkwardness. He was having computer problems, and I nervously remarked that it must be because I’m from Arizona (not sure why I was uneasy…maybe it was his biblical-themed tie with the words “Revelations” on it). He laughed and proceeded to talk about the immigration issues there. It quickly became apparent to me that we were clearly on different sides there. But I didn’t dare let that show. This man held the final badge in my bureaucratic sash. After what seemed like an eternity, but was more like four minutes, I had my new title. Success!
This is why we have stumbled
Dull roots with spring rain.
A weathered basket full of driftwood will be placed on the floor in the fireplace opening
Yes. Today is no different.
So thank you, Mr. Telstra, for helping me find my chutzpah today. Oh, and the refund will be most welcome, too.
Parallelogram: A = b×h
I have coloured her with some Flexmarker, Chalks for her cheeks and Prisma Pencils for added shading...
Please check your settings to make sure that word verification is turned off ,, most people don't even realise it is turned on so please double check.
Memorial Day, originally called Decoration Day, is a day of remembrance for those who have died in our nation’s service. There are many stories as to the actual beginnings of Decoration Day, but Waterloo, N. Y., was officially declared the birthplace of Memorial Day by President Lyndon Johnson. There is also evidence that organized women’s groups in the South were decorating graves before the end of the Civil War.
of peacekeepers they contribute
02) Tonight, Tonight
I'm tempted to draw a parallel with the Mexican Flu "pandemic" in recent years, reports of which were whipped up into a media frenzy until the whole world seemed to be trembling on its feet in the face of an impending disaster. Very few people questioned the veracity of the reports, alarmist chatter spread the patently nonsensical notions of the end of life as we know it, and when nothing particularly dramatic happened the matter was discreetly dropped after, apparently, the pharmaceutical companies had filled their pockets with public sector money paid by a government driven to distraction by the prophecies of doom. (This totally aside from the discussion how government policy is infuenced by corporate lobbying, once again a story for another time).
"I love you," she chokes out. I lean close to her, tears pouring faster down my cheeks.
(Just a quick heads up- I am asking if you will do me a little favor at the end of the post-
Yes, dugout canoes of tree logs are surely an ancient basic water travel technology found throughout the world -- also in Nigeria, but dugouts are still quite an extended technological distance from the kind of boats found at Abydos in Egypt.
100's of pictures in every single mode your camera has
Next on the list was to see the Trevi Fountain. We managed to find it at night and man was it beautiful!!! I threw a couple coins in for good luck.
Irish Celebrity Big Brother contestant Georgia Salpa is fifth, followed by US pop star Katy Perry. Megan Fox, glamour model Keeley Hazell, Friends With Benefits star Mila Kunis and Dancing On Ice contestant Emily Atack complete the top 10.
Micky Schembri
Have a Happy Easter, it isn't just about bunnies or anything...
According to “Maggie,” the woman who took the photograph, when she started taking pictures of the troops one of them told her, “Just training Ma’am. Joining up with another patrol at the rally point.”
4. Music – the playful score by Ryuichi Sakamoto, whether using up-to-date synths or riffing on Ravel’s evergreen ‘Bolero’, perfectly matches the film, making the soundtrack almost as distinctive as the visuals.
My life is slowly returning to somewhat routine tracks, yet again, not quite. I have entered a novel existence and I guess it only dawned on me first very recently that I have truly moved on.
(Caitanya-caritamrta Madhya 24.258 Purport)
“The Evolution of Fiqh,” Abu Ameenah Bilal Philips. Tawheed Publication, 1988.
So, a few awesome people already know this (probably the same few who read this blog), but last semester I did a graduate research project on Outfit of the Day bloggers. Now it looks like I may write my thesis for my Sociology M.A. on OOTD blogs. In the interest of full disclosure, I comment and subscribe to blog feeds both because I find them interesting and because I'm researching. In ethnographic terms I am doing participant observation. I just want you to know that, because I'm not trying to be some kind of sneakypants.
4) Even more strenuous efforts to hasten the conquest - by demography, immigration, conversion, subversion and, when the time is right, force - of Western Europe and, a generation or so later, North America.
Now, to do my Liebster Blog duties and introduce my 5 nominees. I’m not sure if these blogs are new or if they have less than 200 followers, but I greatly enjoy them and would love to share them with you!
It's a sizzling summer of new products now available at the Wild Creations On-line Store!
- Only 1 more day until Sophia Grace and Rosie are back on Ellen
The Secret Service says it resolved any questions over comments made by Ted Nugent, who had said in an interview he would be “dead or in jail” if the President is re-elected. They found out that being stupid is just a side effect of having cat scratch fever.
In honor of "For The Record" dropping on limited edition red wax, Coney Island's finest decided to give us a quick freestyle over his choice PR beat of the moment..
In this spat, this snarky boy I saw everything wrong in all the people gone wrong.
# 1 If your lover betrayed you, what will your reaction be?
Words & Music by Harry M. Woods (1925)
EYTT’s Education and Program Coordinator, Gema Alonso, has worked with our students since summer 2011. She has developed a mentoring and academic relationship with each of them in preparation for the SLE. Throughout this time students have made progress towards their personal and academic goals. As the program transitions it will be amazing to witness these young men and women continue to form their identities and become conscious global citizens. Our students are enthusiastic about what is to come in the next seven months, from exploring their own city to packing up and traveling overseas.
I initially watched the film as an early entry in Louis Jouvet's oeuvre. Jouvet's role is minor, if arresting: he plays a less-than-pure monk, assigned a number of delicious speeches, but it's hardly more than a cameo. Still, it's the first time that he played a character who wasn't drawn from one of his stage roles, and while the stage is never far from his performance style -- particularly the way he rolls words around in his mouth -- his work feels more relaxed, and less bound-up by stage business, than was the case in his previous screen performances.
The bile must be touching the back of their tongues.
Great job, TSA. Congratulations, Houston PD. You were successful at failing to catch any terrorists while simultaneously informing any terrorists that have the wherewithal and common sense to watch the news and use the internet that you’re going to be checking for them at bus stops. Very well played, America. Well done, indeed.
How can you make them feel welcome on your site, in your booth, in your ad? How can you improve their life with your art? You need to believe in the importance of your work and in connecting with your ideal customer.
"Well, I must say that while we're disappointed, we understand your decision." Dopey rises from our couch with a dejected look on his face. He hands us a business card. "Give us a call if you ever change your mind."
R5- sc in each (24) join with FLO of 1st sc
I looked like an idiot on the bus this morning!!!
Did I mention I have a 4 day weekend coming up… woot!!
Hello universe! I would like to proudly introduce to you Rosie’s Bijoux Boutique AKA RBB Jewelry. For those of you who know me, you already know I make costume jewelry. I love to dabble into all the different aspects of it: beading, stamping, etching and the list goes on. I don’t just do strictly jewelry, I’ll do any kind of bling, whether it’s a bookmark or something pretty to dangle from your shoes. I also do repairs, whether on my own jewelry or something bought from a store.Soon enough I’ll be creating my own website with my jewelry to sell. I’ll display my logo and pictures. But until then, I’ll tease you a bit with pictures of things I’ve made so far. I hope you enjoy!
Platinum Sponsor
We just took down our two walk through baby gate (technically Jayce ripped one out of the wall, hulk style) Why have a gate up when the youngest child can open it on his own.
~ Missionaries and the Merrie Monarch- The missionaries brought many changes. We present Hula depicting this era as well as celebrating King Kalakaua.
To satisfy my only interest in her, why she’s here, I walk closer and get a view of what she’s wearing. My eyes widen with shock. A skin tight red leather dress leaves little to my vast imagination; thin straps hold up perked up cleavage, and it ends right about where the curve of her backside would poke out if she were standing. A ‘fuck me’ dress if I’ve ever seen one. The matching 4 inch red leather heels don’t do much to negate this impression. I walk past her and head to the bathroom a little out of sorts. Some days you just don’t know what to expect, and there’s no cover that will ever explain the book.
With our mouths we can give life to others. We can encourage, thank, appreciate, build up, edify, and point others to Christ with our mouths. We can stir up, give hope, lift up the downcast and love. We can teach, bless and sing God’s glorious truths. We can strengthen the weary, or point out where God is working in their lives. We can pray for others, express our compassion and warn against temptation. We can welcome newcomers to church. We can counsel, read Scriptures to each other and share our testimonies. We can extend forgiveness, teach our children, and tell the good news of Jesus.
I have more, but you'd be bored, so I'll do another post full of randomness soon! Promise.
The daisies growing in a small patch inside Lakeside were beautiful, too. They’re located right along the Lake Erie shore at the east end of Lakeside near Perry Park.
Good morning and thank you for following along or choosing to live vicariously through our adventures over the next week as we spend some time rebuilding homes in New Orleans!
John Williams is a Briton making Japanese films. This is his third feature but it borrows so extensively from David Lynch and Haruki Murakami that it lacks a heart of its own.
There is no indication, for instance, who Terasasi’s bankers might be, but they might be beginning to take notice.
Lest it devolve into a hagiography, journalists Gabe Pressman, Pete Hamill and Jeff Greenfield, and especially author and U. Massachusetts professor Vincent Cannato, added some much needed brio to the discussion, taking a more balanced view on the Lindsay administration, pointing out the unique strengths of the activist, media-genic Mayor and his progressive administration but also its weaknesses, failures and shortcomings, including the operational (failure to plow out Queens following the blizzard, the attempts to dislocate Queens homeowners at the behest of developers), the political (failure to intervene in the Ocean-Brownsville community control situation that led to teacher strikes and political unrest) and the simply tone deaf (failure to recognize the identity and political clout of the working class and unionized white ethnic voters, which resonated with suggestions of elitism.) Mention was only made en passant of the Knapp Commission’s police corruption investigations which in fact, according to news reports at the time, back In the day, brought a panelist and mayoral aide to the brink of an indictment for allegedly changing his testimony regarding the handling of the early reports of corruption. (When Officers Serpico and Durk reported corruption to Mayoral Aide Kriegel, did he or didn’t he tell the Mayor?-- Sources indicate that the administration, fearing possible summer unrest in minority communities, chose not to challenge the NYPD establishment at the time.)
Sunday, Giacomo and I went to breakfast where Tori works, then I stayed home the rest of the day doing chores. Tori arrived home in the afternoon, made me dinner (grilled cheese on low carb bread, salad and homemade low carb chocolate peanut butter cookies), and we hung out in my room watching TV and playing on our laptops. Very low key. A lovely Mother's Day.
Lastly, don’t feel you have to give up EVERY indulgence because you have no idea what any of the ingredients are… consuming a fast food meal or an Oreo once in a while will not lead to your demise. It’s easy to get bogged down if you don’t give yourself a break! I smiled to myself as I loaded my very last purchase into my bag….ahhh Cadbury Crème Egg, how I love thee!
we do that. So true.
Jackson is very sad that it is almost gone - he is FOR SURE his father's son. David LOVES winter and the snow!
Now, I myself have watched the show a few times, but since I don’t really speak Arabic, I haven’t been pulled into its charismatic appeal like many lovelorn women here. The show looks like many typical Western soap operas to me, packed with drama, romance, beautiful actors, posh sets, and lush settings. In other words, it’s not very realistic at all to us regular folk, just like Western soaps.
It is important to note that Commonwealth citizens were classed as British citizens and had the same rights as British people here. This was known as civic britannicus sum, or “equal rights for all British subjects.” The British Nationality Act of 1948 did not give them that right but codified it.
Ginger! Got it. Her old address and the name of her father. Not content just with copying down the info, I also took a photo of the page to make sure records did not disappear . I felt like a cold war spy.
So without further ado please allow me to share this page I made about the same old me ;)
That said.. we, at Megaladon LLP, must be ever vigilant to all marketing opportunities… and as you know, I shall be going on a Twitter course early next week with a famous celebrity chef, to ensure that we are at the forefront of modern social media tecniques.
And, if you missed anything here at Design It Chic, you can now check the Blog Tips section at the top of the page, if you need more tips on building up your blog, new blog design tutorials, search engine optimization tricks or all the easy steps to improve your blog's traffic! Happy Friday!
The wounds touched her
My carbs come from things like vegetables and fruits. I eat white rice about once or twice a month. I eat sweet potatoes, white potatoes, and squash when I crave them. I cannot WAIT for cherry season, but right now I eat a lot of blackberries, plums, nectarines, and apples. We have fish around twice a week. We eat a lot of buffalo and grass fed steak we order online. We eat lamb about once a week. Standard side dishes for us are green beans, broccolini with parmesan, brussels sprouts, artichokes, and mashed pumpkin squash. We eat quite a variety of food, basically.
Very quickly, feelings of antagonism emerged against those who didn’t support the strike – those who might betray them. A miner who continued working, or who broke the strike was labelled ‘a scab’. These men became outcasts; there was no mercy shown. This is probably when my feelings came into play. I have a tendency to sympathise with the persecuted.
A quote on an EDL forum page attributed to Andy Bowie, national organiser, reads: “For those that did not see the cancellation notification, the EDL leadership have decided to cancel the planned Harrow demonstration in January.
ok, we are going to hide ourselves in plain sight, ha ha
his lips neck and shoulders. and he nibbled back . They were in perfect
More than just a British affair, people from all around the globe have their eyes on the event. It’s just like something straight out of the fairytales – a prince marrying the woman he loves, despite the fact that she is a commoner in the eyes of the aristocracy – and we all know how much appeal fairytales have regardless of time and location. In these hard economic times, everybody’s looking for a bit of fluff. And what can be more romantic than an elaborate festival celebrating the union of two people in love – one of them true-blue royalty to boot?
Oh yeah- Breakfast
Cabinet Member for Culture for Enfield Council
He began to get tired, feel sick.
For the last 3 years I have firmly believed that my daughter is a modern-day “canary”, due to her extreme sensitivities and reactions to environmental exposures and food. As I read about other parents stories in the autism community, the ADHD community, the mental illness in children community, the sensory processing disorder communities, and the neuro-metabolic disorder communities, I amass more and more information about “hyper-sensitive” children and have even learned about a new political movement called the “Canary Party” : The Canary Party is a movement created to stand up for the victims of medical injury, environmental toxins and industrial foods by restoring balance to our free and civil society and empowering consumers to make health and nutrition decisions that promote wellness.
I need to put his feelings before mine…
There is no way in hell any of Rome’s post-takeover accomplishments resembles those of the Obama Administration’s. And to compare Rome’s bureaucratic efficiencies with those of of the Environmental Protection Agency, the Department of Labor, Transportation Security Agency (or most other government entities outside of our military) is incomprehensible. And, as a bonus, we now have cultural/race division galore. Instead of meritocracy, Team Obama imposes rampant crony capitalism.
Peach cobbler is great. Lots of crust, not soupy, and not too sweet.
Mum and dad have taken Ned away for a couple of days so I can have a break. I miss him badly already. Whenever I drop him at school I don't feel bad. I know he loves preschool. But for some reason I'm wracked with mother's guilt this afternoon. I feel guilty for shipping him off. For feeling like a need a break from parenting.
I did some research on the Axel Brynelson Law Firm and found that in May 2010, the firm represented Monsanto in a lawsuit concerning a DNA patent. So, within days of ruling that Americans have no right to produce and consume the foods of their choice, Judge Fiedler is hired by a law firm that represents Monsanto. What a coincidence!
For hair care during the transition, wear styles that avoid heat. Hair transitions can be done more effectively and healthily when exposed to minimal or no heat. These styles include roller and rod sets, two-stand twists and two-stand twist outs, straw sets and bantu knots. Textured-looking styles (such as those just mentioned) are excellent during the transition to natural hair because it helps to blend your two hair textures (relaxed and natural). These styles, particularly as they age, mimic natural hair styles.
and leaves a man alive
It is a very good thing that I had a relaxing holiday weekend, because I have gone right back to my 'office by day, revisions by night' schedule of unholy doom. And as if to prove a point, in the middle of writing that sentence I was dragged off to negotiate with florists. (Oh, day job. You give me such interesting life skills.)
Last but not least was the # 1 performance of day 1 and my long awaited debut of seeing the Swedish House Mafia. Axwell, Steve Angello and Sebastian Ingrosso, together known as the Swedish House Mafia had an absolute massive performance on the Main Stage. Massive is the only word I am able to come up when trying to explain this set, the stage production was huge with several up and down moving led screens, flames and fireworks on stage and in the air, huge confetti explosions, and a truly insane lazer show. If you have an hour to spare, here is their entire live set to close out day 1 of Coachella 2012 Weekend 1.
Oslo
"As the system of bourgeois economy has developed for us only by degrees so too its negation, which is its ultimate result." p712.
Except for the Bangladesh and PRC that were randomly taking photos of ppl. Like they are armed with their camera phones, and snapping away at random ppl. Especially girls wearing bikinis. Tall, short, fat, skinny, black, white, pretty, ugly. They just take photo of all of them.
On the nose - Black treacle and liquorice. Bold, rich and quietly terrifying.
Rudy Wiebe is a writer of considerable skill and subtlety, and this novel finds him in sure-footed control of a fascinating, complicated, highly relevant, and powerful story. One could quibble, I suppose, over the vexing intricacies of Wiebe genealogy, but, in fact, there is no overweening need to keep diagrammatic track of it. Those who go to the effort will be rewarded with a clearer chronological sense of a complex cultural history, but those who don’t, will be at no great disadvantage.
Until everything becomes duller than you remember, or just harder to do.
But between now and June there are meets galore at the other levels of the sport. Every weekend holds a smorgasbord of potential action. High school dual meets. High school and college invitationals - and at the college level there are community colleges, Div I, Div II, and Div III! There is always something local, and never more than perhaps an hour to an hour and a half drive to get to near elite level competition on the Division I college level.
“The people of Kennington will just shrug their shoulders at the development and get on with their lives.
I intend to write more this year. As well as writing my book for Bloomsbury I would like to write at least one other book for children or teens. I still harbour ambitions to write a graphic novel and I may try my hand at writing a screenplay this year too. But I would also like to write something for adults. I'm not absolutely sure what that will be yet, but I'll let you know if and when it comes to anything.
Well lets compare the pictures above with the picture below, again tweeted by the man himself, that night,
CHINESE FOOD. That’s what my family is addicted to. Whenever we go out, we always find a perfect place to satisfy our cravings — stronger than simply normal hunger. Being perfect doesn’t mean a place with picturesque chandeliers and a five-star-hotel ambiance. For a foodie, the appearance and taste of the food would always be a top priority.
Number 4 says, "After marking the ballot, re-fold it and place it inside this Secrecy Sleeve." The capital letters made me feel important. The problem is, the Secrecy Sleeve is the paper on which the instructions are written. It simply folds in half. There is nothing secret about it. When someone at the elections office opens the envelope, the ballot will quite likely slip right out of its Secrecy Sleeve. End of secret.
as a guest, your home is a place of justice, it is a piece of cake.
“What’s the day and the year, Mr. Handy?”
Pain n' misery are patient. They know I'm slowin' down, and like a pack of hyenas they prowl my perimeter, sendin' in their lackey's to use up what little energy I have left and no doubt tellin' their commanders, despair n' hopelessness, the battle is almost won.
I was reminded at a meeting recently how fortunate my life has been. Despite my years of drinking I remained what many call "a functioning drunk", i.e. I got up every morning, got dressed and got to work. I did enough at work not to get sacked and therefore the money continued to come in. In fact I was very fortunate that I was in an industry and a job that paid very well indeed and therefore the money I needed to feed my habit wasn't difficult to find, I could drink enough and not have to squirrel money away for that from the bills, the shopping etc. I was lucky too that I found recovery before I started to lose the things that really matter - family in particular.
could ever
Instead, when we went up to the cash register to pay, he pointed to a little old couple that had been sitting in the table next to us.
2) I love sweet-n-salty treats over any other food.
If so, say “yes – truth” and allow the energy of the Divine to flow to and through every cell of your body, filling each, invigorating each, and filling in-between the cells with light and love.
Lydia got to play in an orchestra this year. It was very fun and exciting! The school district celebrated its 10th year of Suzuki String instruction in their schools. To celebrate, the had the composer of this song to come and conduct them play. Lydia played in an elementary Spring Orchestra which played with the Elementary Honor Orchestra, Jr. High Orchestra and High School Orchestras. There were 300 students playing all together. It was very neat!
We collected the boxes. The same ones he had been so addomant on keeping just ten days earlier. No joke. About ten days. In a short time we had seen this young man in two extremes of the human spectrum. A guy on the brink of acheiving the dream. A wife, a house, a good job (which he still has, I presume) and a life of happy content on the horizon. Now, reduced to a cold apartment, robbed of the dream and throwing away his child hood toys and his precious cardboard boxes becuase he didn’t have the room to keep them around. Gutted. There was no room to grow a tree or throw a frisbee. No life.
In other housekeeping news. Over this past weekend I posted some "new and exciting" (at least to me LOL) things about the Everyday Bliss blog. I foolishly sent it out on the Saturday of a holiday weekend so I don't think many of you actually saw it and those who did were very silent on the matter so I thought I'd mention it again today (go here to read the entire post.) If you read this blog in facebook or a reader some of the features might not work properly so please click the original post link if you are interested in seeing what I'm talking about!
The sounds of SE Asia are amazing. The sleek Skytrain of Bangkok is barely audible. But outside the Skytrain, the sounds of touts is never-ending. Someone is always selling something and farangs (foreigners) are always the target! In Koh Samui, the sale is about MA-SSAGE?????? That’s how the girls say it…with a long delay in both syllables and as if asking a question. In Kuala Lumpur, the horns and constant traffic are only matched in volume by the Call to Prayer broadcast over the speakers strategically placed all around town. The greatest sound…the quiet Kob Kun Kaa (thank you) spoken by a Thai with the little bow of the head and the prayer-like position of their hands!
You get the picture right? There are however, many differences between the two.
Adam and I were approaching our 10-year anniversary, and I was finally, and suddenly, struck with the desire to have a baby. In my younger days I would have been fine with having a baby out of wed lock especially while in a stable, lengthy and committed relationship. Today, I feel the opposite, and strongly. Even when friends joked by saying that we could start baby making weeks before I’d walk down the aisle because I wouldn’t show yet, I’d sternly respond with, “I refuse to be a pregnant bride.”
If you’re a parent, I’m sure you’ve heard this before. “Enjoy every minute of it because it goes by so quickly”. I in no way doubt this. I already look at my three year old and can’t believe she was my wee little baby not long ago. And I can’t believe that one day she will be a grown woman, hopefully with a family of her own.
It works the same way in our life. We end up paying too high a price because of lifestyle drainers that steal energy from our lives. Living well requires that a leader periodically evaluates his connections. I have identified at least nine lifestyle energy drainers in my own life.
So…what’s the hold up? Call your friends (4 is the maximum), email me at pecancottage@gmail.com to check availability, send me a $100 PayPal non-refundable deposit, and get ready to PARTY with your best gal pals!!
down in New Orleans
But, if you can't wait...and I get it, I am an impatient sort myself, you can purchase a copy right now for $29.97!
Ellen DeGeneres (The Ellen DeGeneres Show) (WINNER)
Edit, 9/12/2007, comment from below incorporated into this post:
Welcome to H2H 2012! We have a lot of cool challenges coming your way with more Design Team members than ever before! This week, you will get to meet them all, starting today with our Guest DT for January, Jami Larson!
And now Coach Brown says he’s going to hell.
The subcommittee's probe of a sitting governor is unusual, according to historians, and unprecedented in modern times.
The earl asked, “What ails thy foot, Icelander?”
"Okay." As if I have any other options here.
Thought you'd like to see what came down our pike on Monday night! Yep... Ellie, our golden retriever was acting funky all weekend and rarely left her nest in the garage since Friday.
I took a deep breath. Then I took another one.
Though in reality there exist a regiment called Jat regiment ,so in a way the extra “a” or the extra “t” in word jat is nothing but a slang of the respective language of that place.
The Northern Ireland Caries Prevention in Practice (NIC-PIP) trial is a landmark research study monitoring the oral health of some 1,200 children aged 2-4 over a four-year period. Around 88 dentists are participating right across Northern Ireland.
"Are you sure you want someone like me fighting on your side."
However, Deepika’s ‘Mit Jaaye Gham’ received mixed responses and couldn’t improve on the popularity of Kat’s ‘Sheila Ki Jawaani’. When Katrina was asked about her reviews on ‘Mit Jaaye Gham’, the ‘Sheila Ki Jawani’ hottie mentioned that she was not interested in commenting on Deepika’s item song. Talking about ‘Mit Jaaye Gham’, Katrina said, she’s doesn’t have any interest to discuss such things.
to make them better and responsible individual in society.
DP: Bo Bunny's "Snowfall Collection"
I started writing this post at 6am. I awoke with the title in my head, which I'll explain later.
The other day I was explaining to someone that not only do we not celebrate Christmas, Hubby & I don't exchange gifts. Ever. It just doesn't make sense to us because we collapsed our finances years ago. Instead, we buy things together - often when we travel. I'll buy a piece of jewellery, he'll buy a watch or t-shirt, or we'll pick out a piece of art. That way we remember the trip, not a birthday or anniversary (which we think we can remember all on our own). But the woman I was talking to asked me this, "if you don't exchange gifts, how do you know he loves you?"
What could it be?
I also entered my class into the class valentine exchange. Right after I got the name of the class I was getting really worried about what my class could make that would make this class happy to receive valentine's at all. The class I got was fellow blogger First Grade Blue Skies. I had been following her blog during the summer and all of her cute creations. Me who doesn't do much art/crafty stuff in the classroom because we have no time, how was I going to create something that fit in the lines of a fellow crafty blogger? So needless to say, I struggled to find anything that my kids could create. I even made them peel crayons for one idea but then ended up changing my mind about it. I wonder if I would have been worried about what valentines to make if I had never heard of her blog at all. :-/ But in the end it all worked out and she and her class loved the valentines we created. You can see a picture of them over at her blog First Grade Blue Skies. I will post pictures of what her class sent us soon.
discovers his plan, he sets up a trap for Darshun and his five
The repatriation was very moving indeed, everyone gathers in the High Street and stands around chatting to each other while the press set up their cameras and whatnot.
